Draft Environmental Impact Statement Elwha River Ecosystem Restoration Implementation April 1996 Contents _______________________________________________________________________ Purpose and Need: The Elwha River ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries are severely degraded as a result of two hydroelectric dams (projects) and their reservoirs built in the early 1900s.
Congress has mandated the full restoration of this ecosystem and its native anadromous fisheries through the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act (Public Law 102-495).
The Department of the Interior has found there is a need to return this river and the ecosystem to its natural, self-regulating state, and proposes to implement the Congressional mandate by removing both dams in a safe environmentally sound and cost effective manner and implementing fisheries and ecosystem restoration planning.
No other alternative would fully restore the ecosystem or its native anadromous fisheries.
Proposed Action River Erosion Alternative: The U.S. Department of the Interior proposes to fully restore the Elwha River ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries through the removal of Elwha Dam and Glines Canyon Dam and implementing fish restoration and revegetation.
Dam removal would occur over an 18-month to 2-year period.
Elwha Dam would be removed by blasting, and Glines Canyon Dam by a combination of blasting and diamond-wire saw cutting.
Lake Aldwell would be drained by a diversion channel, and Lake Mills by notching down Glines Canyon Dam.
Stored sediment would be eroded naturally by the Elwha River.
The project area is located in Clallam County, on the Olympic Peninsula, in Washington State.
Lead agency: National Park Service
Cooperating agencies: U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, U.S. Bureau of Reclamation, U.S. Bureau of Indian Affairs, U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, and the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe
Type of statement: This is a draft environmental impact statement which is procedurally connected (tiered) to the Department of the Interior Elwha River Ecosystem Restoration Final Environmental Impact Statement (June 1995).
This statement examines alternatives for implementing the policy choice to remove both Elwha and Glines Canyon Dam based on Interiors Elwha River Ecosystem Restoration statement.
Abstract: In addition to the proposed action, two other alternatives are examined.
They are: the Dredge and Slurry alternative (removing fine-grained sediment prior to dam removal by using suction dredges, and sending the slurry to the Strait of Juan de Fuca in a pipeline), and No Action (dams are retained as is, without fish passage measures).
The proposed action is also the Department of the Interiors preferred alternative.
Short-term negative impacts from removing both dams could result from the release of sediment now trapped in the reservoirs.
The finer grained particles could temporarily but significantly impact fish or other aquatic organisms.
Impacts on water quality, river morphology, flooding, native anadromous and resident (e.g. trout and char) fisheries, living marine resources, wildlife, threatened and endangered species, vegetation, cultural resources, land use, recreation, aesthetics, and socioeconomics are examined in this environment impact statement.
Both of the other alternatives would also have significant impacts on resources examined in this document.
Public Comment Period: Written comments will be taken for a period of 60 days on the draft environmental impact statement.
They should be sent to Sarah Bransom, National Park Service, Denver Service Center, Resource Planning, DSC-RP, 12795 West Alameda Parkway, P.O. Box 25287, Denver Colorado 80225-0287, phone (303) 969-2210.
Public meetings to take oral and/or written comments will be scheduled during this time.
Questions on the project should be addressed to Dr. Brian Winter, Elwha Project Leader, at Olympic National Park in Port Angeles, (360) 452-0302.
[Page numbering retained, MS Word document = hardcopy] Pg. 12 = pg.1
Summary
Introduction
This document is a draft environmental impact statement (DEIS), prepared to analyze environmental impacts of alternative ways to remove two hydroelectric projects on the Elwha River.
This DEIS is the second of two, which in combination study how to fully restore the rivers dam-altered ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries in a safe, environmentally sound and cost-effective manner.
The first, "programmatic" EIS (Elwha River Ecosystem Restoration Final Environmental Impact Statement) was finalizes in June, 1995.
The programmatic EIS is procedurally connected (tiered) to this document, the Implementation EIS.
Professionals in a variety of technical fields from a group of federal agencies and the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe, as well as consultants and the public helped define project objectives and the range of reasonable alternatives.
They also analyzed the impacts of those alternatives to important environmental resources.
The National Park Service is the lead agency in the production of this analysis and documentation, and the US Bureau of Reclamation, US Fish and Wildlife Service, US Bureau of Indian Affairs, US Army Corps of Engineers and Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe are cooperating agencies.
This team of agency preparers and contributors is referred to throughout this document as the EIS Team.
Purpose and Need
The action proposed and analyzed in this environmental impact statement is the full restoration of the Elwha River ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries through the removal of two hydroelectric dams and implementation of fisheries restoration and revegetation.
The dams were installed without fish passage facilities on the Elwha River, on the Olympic Peninsula in Washington State (figure 1).
Elwha Dam was built first, 4.9 miles from the mouth of the river.
Construction spanned the years 1910-1914.
Glines Canyon Dam was completed 8.5 miles further upstream in 1927.
Both impound reservoirs: the Elwha Dam forms the Lake Aldwell reservoir, and Glines Canyon Dam forms the Lake Mills reservoir.
Before the dams were built, the Elwha River produced an estimated 380,000 migrating salmon and trout.
The construction of Elwha Dam eliminated 93% of Elwha River habitat for these anadromous fish, and began what became a precipitous decline in the native populations of all 10 runs of Elwha salmon and sea-going trout.
Salmon populations in the Elwha River are not the only ones declining, nor are dams the only reason for their decline.
Salmonid number in many rivers of the Pacific Northwest are falling for a variety of reasons.
Some species are overfished, some are affected on a large scale by fluctuations in the marine environment, and some are affected by conditions in their freshwater habitat.
Silt from logging, dredging for gold and from the building and use of roads covers and smothers eggs.
Water diversions for industrial, municipal or commercial use, and the addition of pollutants such as pesticides all increase fish disease and mortality.
FIGURE 1.
Location Map
Pg. 13 = pg.3
However, dams, even with fish measures installed, are a primary cause of fish mortality.
It is estimated the series of dams on the Columbia-Snake river system kill 85 to 95% of migrating smolts on their way to sea, and between 34 and 57% of adults returning to spawn (Sims 1994).
This is despite an estimated $1.5 billion spent over the last 13 years to implement fish passage measures on the Columbia and Snake Rivers (Satchell 1994).
Degraded freshwater habitat is often expensive and difficult to restore because of developments like dams, roads, agriculture, and water withdrawals for municipal and industrial use.
In contrast, the Elwha River remains in pristine condition along most of its length.
The single action of removing both dams would restore to pre-dam, high quality condition the vast majority of habitat formerly available to Elwha anadromous fish.
Several specific problems for native anadromous fish and the Elwha River ecosystem are a direct result of the dams.
Neither dam has passage measures for fish, and so they obstruct upstream fish migration beyond the first 4.9 miles of the river.
The natural transport of coarse sediment downstream has also been halted by the dams and its resulting absence has rendered the river downstream of the dams largely unusable by fish.
Salmon and steelhead once filled 70 miles of mainstem and tributary habitat in the Elwha.
Their carcasses fed more than 22 species of wildlife and supplied the entire aquatic ecosystem with organic material, phosphorus and nitrogen.
Now, populations of primarily hatchery fish return to only the 4.9 miles of river below the Elwha Dam to spawn in crowded, unnatural and poor quality conditions.
Both the terrestrial and aquatic ecosystems are less productive and varied as a result.
Humans have occupied the Elwha valley for thousands of years, and have integrated the river and its salmon into much of their daily lives.
When the dams separated the fish from their spawning grounds and populations rapidly declined, the Elwha Klallam people were affected culturally, spiritually and economically.
Many tribal socioeconomic problems which persist today have had their roots in this decline.
The dams are also inconsistent with the federal trust responsibility and treaty rights guaranteed to the Elwha Klallam and three other Indian tribes in the 1855 Treaty of Point No Point and the Treaty with the Makah.
Because the dams and reservoirs on the Elwha River have caused and continue to cause major, adverse impacts to the rivers native anadromous fish populations, wildlife, aquatic ecology and cultural resources, the department of the Interior determined in its programmatic environmental impact statement they would be removed to fully restore the ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries.
This EIS examines alternative methods of removing them in a safe, environmentally sound and cost-effective manner and proposes a plan to restore the rivers native anadromous fisheries and ecosystem.
Pg. 14 = pg. 4 
Alternatives
The proposed action (the River Erosion alternative) is to initiate river restoration by removing both dams over a two-year period.
Lake Mills would initially be drawn down with Glines Canyon Dam in place to provide flood control water storage until a diversion channel to drain Lake Aldwell is complete.
Elwha Dam would be removed by controlled blasting, and Glines Canyon Dam would be removed by a combination of controlled blasting and diamond wire saw cutting of concrete blocks.
Sediment would be eroded naturally by the river.
The proposed action would involve lowering Lake Aldwell enough to build a temporary cofferdam and excavate a diversion channel through the north spillway.
The reservoir would be lowered through the channel enough to remove fill material, which now serves to control seepage through the dam foundation.
Elwha Dam would then be blasted in sections, and rubble trucked to one or more of nine disposal sites under consideration within a 32-mile radius.
Some project features outside the river channel may be buried under backfill material.
During the low flow period of the second year, the river channel and dam would be lowered in increments to completely drain the reservoir.
Removal of Glines Canyon Dam would begin following completion of the diversion channel at Elwha Dam, as Lake Mills would be operated to maximize flood storage and minimize work stoppages at Elwha Dam. Glines Canyon Dam would be notched by saw cutting and blasting.
The notches would be sized and their removal timed to allow about 7.5 feet of reservoir drawdown every two weeks.
Concrete rubble and other waste would be hauled to the disposal sites described above.
The majority of sediment accumulation lies behind Glines Canyon Dam.
A portion of this sediment would be eroded naturally by the Elwha river.
The reservoir and river channel would be extensively monitored.
The sediment release rate from the reservoirs would be controlled by controlling the rate of dam removal.
A second sediment management alternative, the Dredge and Slurry alternative, was also considered and is fully analyzed in this Implementation EIS.
This alternative involves the use of suction dredges mounted on barges in each reservoir.
Fine-grained sediment composed of silt and clay would be slurried with water and sent through a pipeline to the Strait of Juan de Fuca.
From Lake Mills to Lake Aldwell, the pipeline would follow roads and the river channel to Lake Aldwell.
It would be fixed in place in the river until it reached Elwha Dam where it would follow one of two routes to the strait: the river or county roads.
The Dredge and Slurry alternative and the proposed action (the River Erosion alternative) are referred to as the action alternatives in this EIS.
A No Action alternative, or the continuation of conditions as they are now with the dams in place, was also analyzed.
The EIS Team examined many different options for removing the dams and managing the sediment behind them.
The reasoning behind eliminating several dam removal and sediment management alternatives is described in the Alternatives chapter, under the section titled "Alternatives Considered But Rejected."
The EIS team also analyzed alternatives for fisheries restoration, revegetation, water quality, flood protection and land management.
A summary of actions required or considered to restore, protect, or manage these resources follows.
A variety of measures would be used to help restore the Elwhas salmon and anadromous trout and char.
Some of these measures include the use of hatcheries to develop and maintain broodstock, outplanting eggs, fry and smolts by tank truck, helicopters and other means, the use of acclimation ponds in the river, and harvest management (i.e. fishing restrictions).
Because the Lower Elwha Tribal Fish Hatchery is needed to accommodate the restoration effort, as well as to protect broodstock during dam removal, it would be fitted with a larger capacity infiltration gallery and new wells located near the river.
Pg. 15 = pg. 6
Ecosystem restoration measures would include revegetation of land acquired by Olympic National Park at Glines Canyon damsite and the drained Lake Mills reservoir.
Revegetation of the lake beds would involve some natural recolonization and a moderately intensive program of planting native species.
Planting seeds, cuttings and trees of different ages would help create a more natural, structurally diverse forest ecosystem in a shorter period of time, and keep exotic vegetation from invading.
This, in turn, would create wildlife habitat and habitat usable by species of special concern.
The return of salmon and steelhead throughout the river would also provide a fundamental link in restoring the Elwha River aquatic and terrestrial ecosystems.
The Elwha Restoration Act (PL 102-495) requires that industrial and municipal water users experience no adverse impacts from dam removal.
This group of users includes the City of Port Angeles municipal and industrial customers served from the Elwha River and the Dry Creek Water Association.
The major impact to these users of Elwha water would be protected by filtering water through the riverbed and collecting it in an infiltration gallery or perforated pipe buried beneath the riverbed.
During dam removal, this would be supplemented with open channel pre-treatment with an approved flocculent and a temporary settling basin.
The City of Port Angeles municipal supply is already experiencing supply problems as the river is meandering away from its current Ranney collector.
A second Ranney collector on the opposite side of the river would ensure a constant supply.
Treatment for iron and manganese may also be required; if so, a filter would be installed.
Dry Creek Water Association could either connect to the city of Port Angeles Ranney system or to a separate treatment facility built to chlorinate and filter its supply.
These measures would protect against adverse project impacts, as well as provide additional longer term benefits to local water users.
Additional mitigation not specifically required by the Elwha Restoration Act, but analyzed by this DEIS and recommended for adoption, would protect individual well users, the Elwha Place Homeowners Association and Lower Elwha Klallam Tribal residents from adverse impacts of dam removal to water quality or sewage treatment capacity.
In addition, increases in flooding from the return to pre-dam elevations of the riverbed and water level may require elevating or otherwise protecting wellheads.
Increases in surface water elevation in some places on the river may also result in increased flooding of homes, cultural resources, or other structures in the floodplain.
Building flood protection levees or dikes, or using flood insurance or other means to protect or compensate homeowners are mitigation measures considered.
Minimizing impacts to cultural resources is required by the National Historic Preservation Act.
These actions are considered an integral part of both action alternatives, and include surveys, inventorying important historic properties and intensive monitoring during and following dam removal to ensure timely action to prevent or mitigate impacts.
Pg. 16 = pg. 7 
Both action alternatives would include the acquisition of land by the federal government.
Lands within Olympic National Park (those now occupied by Glines Canyon Dam facilities and Lake Mills) would be used either for wilderness recreation, interpretive opportunities, or both.
Some features of the project would be left in place to help the park explain the history of the dams and their removal to visitors.
Lands acquired outside park boundaries (Elwha Dam and Lake Aldwell) would be managed by either the park, the state of Washington, US Fish and Wildlife Service, and /or the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe.
Any of the four land managers would be required by the Elwha Restoration Act to leave lands within the floodplain in a natural condition to accommodate fish restoration.
Costs for each alternative are summarized in table 1 below.
Table 1.
Summary of Costs for Each Action Alternative (thousands of dollars)
ACTION
RIVER EROSION
DREDGE AND SLURRY
Project/land acquisition 29,800^a 29,800^a Dam removal 33,567 32,951 Road rehabilitation 528 528 Sediment management^b 22,496 Water quality mitigation 29,770 23,987 Revegetation/wildlife 3,205 3,205 Flooding mitigation 3,998 3,998 Hazardous waste disposal 587 587 Fish restoration^c 7,380 7,380 Cultural resources mitigation 665 665 Monitoring/modeling 2,144 1,844 Total 111,115 127,441
^a Includes other lands and rights costs.
^b Includes cost of slurry pipeline and dredging, all other sediment management costs for both included in monitoring/modeling.
^c Includes hatchery expansion, operation and maintenance.
A No Action alternative was also analyzed to provide a comparison for the two action alternatives.
Under the No Action alternative, no costs associated with construction would be incurred unless the dams require Federal Energy Regulatory commission licensing, in which case those costs as identified in the programmatic EIS (DOI et at.
1995) to install fish passage measures and other upgrades would apply.
Some protection from flooding and water quality treatment is in place now.
These measures include large levees on both the east and west side of the river near the mouth, filters to treat water used by the Daishowa and Rayonier mills and underground collection and chlorination of municipal water used by the city of Port Angeles.
Pg. 17 = pg.8
Summary of Impacts
Fluvial Processes and Sediment Transport
The natural transport of sediment has been blocked by the dams.
As a result about 8.5 million cubic yards of larger-grained or coarse sediment (sand and larger) and 9.2 million cubic yards of fine-grained (silt and clay-sized) sediment has accumulated in the reservoirs.
Under the proposed action (the River erosion alternative), between 4.8 and 5.6 million cubic yards of fine-grained sediment (silts and clays) and between 1.2 and 2.6 million cubic yards of coarse-grained sediment (sand-sized and larger), or less than half of the sediment now stored in the reservoir lake beds and deltas, would be naturally eroded by the Elwha River.
Successive filling and draining of Lake Mills during dam removal would help move the materials toward the dam face so they could be eroded downstream.
In the Dredge and Slurry alternative some of the fine-grained sediments would be removed by pumping them with water through a pipeline to the Strait of Juan de Fuca.
This process would remove an estimated 75% of the silt and clay which would otherwise enter the river during dam removal.
Instead of the 4.8 to 5.6 million cubic yards of fine-grained sediment that would erode from the reservoirs with the proposed action, 1.2 to 1.4 million cubic yards would wash into the Elwha River during dam removal and for the following 6 months.
Sand and gravel which formed the riverbed before the dams were built has eroded out to sea, resulting in a lowered or degraded river channel below the dams.
This section of river channel is also "armored" with larger rocks (cobbles and boulders) and so moves at high river flows.
The loss of riverbed material has severely degraded anadromous fish habitat, allowed vegetation to become firmly established on gravel islands and floodplains, and has reduced natural river meandering and lowered flood stage.
This in turn has curtailed the formation of slower moving side channels, periodic wetlands or riparian areas.
Removing the dams and allowing sediment to erode would return sediment, including spawning gravel, to the river downstream and restore the rivers natural river meandering and flood stage.
Reestablishing the natural sediment load to the river would cause the river to aggrade and the water surface elevation to rise in some places.
Vegetation which has grown in the floodplain may restrict the rivers flow, and may be washed away by scouring as the riverbed returns to pre-dam conditions.
These changes would occur with either the River Erosion or Dredge and Slurry alternative.
Flooding
"Aggradation," or the increase in riverbed elevation and associated increase in water surface elevation after dam removal, would be more pronounced in relatively flat areas.
Modeling indicates aggradation would likely increase over time, and would increase water surface elevations by as much as 1 to 4 feet in some spots on the river, but would average 2 feet.
Many of the homes, wells or cultural resources which would be affected are already in the 100-year floodplain and susceptible to flooding.
Mitigating measures which would provide the present level of flood protection were examined; a description is located in the Impacts to Flooding section.
At this time, raising and strengthening the Lower Elwha Federal Flood Control Levee and measures to protect municipal and/or industrial water users are fully integrated into both action alternatives.
Other mitigation measures are not required by a specific law but are recommended to protect downstream residents and structures.
Pg. 18 = pg. 10
Surface Water
The reservoirs have affected water quality by acting as a large settling basin during floods, landslides or other events which would normally produce surges of turbidity downstream.
During these events, a "slug" of sediment moves slowly through the reservoirs, which dampens peak turbidity levels downstream but extends them over a longer period of time.
Turbidity during floods is therefore less intense but longer lasting because of the reservoirs.
Removing the dams would reduce the longevity of turbidity events, but increase peak levels.
The dam removal process would also greatly increase turbidity (from a maximum of about 800 nephelometric turbidity units (NTUs) now to as much as 25,000 NTUs) for short periods of time (a few days), suspended sediment and possibly dissolved manganese and iron stored in reservoir sediments for the one to two-year period during dam removal.
Using suction dredges to remove up to 75% of the fine-grained sediment would reduce peak turbidities to a maximum of about 10,000 NTUs for one to three day periods during dam removal.
These are major adverse impacts to surface water quality.
Minor changes to pH, temperature and dissolved oxygen would also occur during dam removal.
In the two to six years after dam removal, turbidity, suspended sediment and dissolved iron and manganese would settle to levels slightly to moderately higher than under conditions now.
Turbidity would range up to 1000 NTUs, suspended sediment would average 69 ppm, dissolved iron 20-2,300 micrograms per liter, and manganese 10 to 700 micrograms per liter.
Increased suspended sediment and turbidity would have a long-term moderate adverse impact on water quality, increased iron and manganese a long-term minor impact.
Water temperatures would be decreased in late summer and fall as a result of dam removal.
This would be a major beneficial impact to water quality and aquatic life.
Changes in pH and dissolved oxygen would have negligible or minor impacts to water quality.
Surface water users would, for the most part, not be affected in either the short or long term by dam removal, as mitigation to protect them against adverse impacts of the action is required.
An infiltration gallery and open-channel industrial pre-treatment would be used to treat surface water before serving the City of Port Angeles two largest industrial customers, the Daishowa America and Rayonier mills.
The third user of this water, the Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife fish rearing facility, would be closed during dam removal and Chinook salmon production moved to another facility.
However, the infiltration gallery would stay in place following dam removal and water collected in it would also supply the rearing facility when it reopens.
Pg. 19 = pg. 11
Groundwater
Groundwater users would be affected by changes to the river as a result of the dam removal process.
Infiltration of fine sediments into riverbed substrate or through well screens would increase turbidity and/or decrease yield from the aquifer.
Increased bedload of the river would promote renewed channel migration and band erosion, which might affect yield.
Riverbed aggradation would increase river stage, and wells might be overtopped and contaminated.
Mitigation measures for Port Angeles, Dry Creek Water association, and the Lower Elwha Tribal Fish Hatchery are mandatory and would effectively eliminate impacts of dam removal to these users.
A new Ranney collector installed on the opposite side of the river and upstream from the one which exists now would ensure uninterrupted and high quality municipal supplies for the City of Port Angeles.
The Dry Creek Water Association (DCWA) could either connect to the Ranney well supply, or require a separate filtration and chlorination facility.
Either would protect DCWA users from the adverse impacts of dam removal.
Several other users of Elwha River water, including Elwha Place Homeowners Association (EPHA), individual well users and some residents of the Lower Elwha Klallam Reservation would experience adverse impacts during dam removal.
Mitigation measures to protect each are analyzed in this DEIS and recommended for adoption.
The proposed mitigation for individual well users is described in Impacts to Groundwater section.
It includes raising wellheads, installing in-line filters and temporary storage tanks, drilling to deepen existing wells or create new ones, and a contingency fund.
The Elwha Place Homeowners Association might experience increased turbidity, dissolved iron or manganese and overtopping of their wells as a result of dam removal.
Modifying wellheads, flood-proofing the pump house, and installing a temporary water treatment system would protect EPHA from any adverse impacts of dam removal.
Without mitigation, these users could experience minor to major impacts from dam removal.
Several residents of the Lower Elwha Klallam Reservation would experience higher groundwater levels, rendering their septic systems unusable following dam removal.
A mounded system with lift stations would resolve this impact.
Non-structural solutions to resolve flooding and/or water quality problems might also exist.
Pg. 20 = pg. 12
Native Anadromous Fisheries
The dams and their reservoirs have directly affected salmon and seagoing trout by blocking access to all but the lowest 4.9 miles and by inundating 5.3 miles of what once was high-quality habitat.
Salmonids are restricted by the dams to the lower 4.9 miles of river, and the problems associated with crowding into this space are exacerbated by the near-elimination of spawning gravel and by the higher-than-normal water temperatures that are present during some months both of which are caused by the dams and reservoirs.
Also, many species require slower moving water, riparian vegetation, or a fully functional estuary to spawn or rear, all which have been reduced by the elimination of natural sediment transport.
The number of native anadromous Elwha spawning salmonids has dropped from an estimated 380,000 (or more) to fewer than 3,000 today (1995).
Existing stocks in the lower river unsupported by artificial propagation (hatchery operations) would likely decline to extinction under the No Action alternative.
Removing the dams and draining the reservoirs would restore natural sediment transport, add 5.3 miles of riverine habitat, make accessible the entire 70+ miles of river the fish used before the Elwha Dam was built, and restore high quality habitat in the lower and middle reaches of the Elwha River.
Estimates of the approximate number of each of the five salmon species (representing six runs, or stocks) and steelhead trout (representing two runs) which would return under these conditions, and the time to recovery assuming no hatchery intervention, are presented in table 2 below.
For comparison, estimates of the number of wild production of each species occurring in the river now (i.e.
No Action) are also included.
Table 2.
New Wild Salmonid Production and Recovery Time^a (number of fish/year)
ACTION ALTERNATIVES (FULL RESTORATION)
NO ACTION^b (EXISTING CONDITIONS)
Number of Fish
Years to Recovery
Number of Fish
Chinook
31,000
21-25
1500-2000^c
Coho
35,000
15-18
<
Chum
36,000
18-21
<
Pink
274,000
16-20
<
Steelhead
10,000
15-18
<
Sockeye
6,500
12-20
0
^aAssuming no outplanting or hatchery production.
Outplanting may reduce recovery time by as much as half.
^bNo action (existing conditions) would not result in any new wild salmon or steelhead.
These figures are estimates of current production of wild anadromous fish in the Elwha River.
^cAll Elwha Chinook are considered a composite of wild and hatchery stocks.
Pg. 21 = pg. 13
Short-term Impacts
The release of sediment downstream during the two-year dam removal process would have major adverse short-term impacts on salmonids attempting to return to or spawn in the river.
Most of these are hatchery fish which support commercial or sport fisheries, although some native fish do return and would be used as stock to restore Elwha runs.
The most pronounced effects of dam removal in the short term would be on adults.
Since few, if any, adults entering the river to spawn during dam removal would be successful, egg or juvenile mortality would only be indirectly affected.
Adult summer/fall Chinook begin their upstream migration in July and spawn in September and October.
They would be most severely affected during the initial reservoir drawdown beginning in June of the first year, as well as by the complete dam removal work which begins in July of the second year and lasts through October.
Some adults would enter the river and be killed by suspended sediment loads, and some would avoid the Elwha and stray into neighboring rivers during these periods.
Although the same species would be affected in the same way under both the River Erosion and Dredge and Slurry alternatives, the degree of impact would be less if the bulk of the fine suspended sediment is removed first (as proposed with the Dredge and Slurry option).
Elwha sockeye salmon are considered extinct, and would be restored following dam removal using related stock from Lake Sutherland or a neighboring river.
They are therefore not expected to experience any adverse impacts from dam removal.
Work would be stopped twice during dam removal because of flood flows and to accommodate spawning periods for several species of anadromous fish.
For 20 to 85 days beginning in November, work would stop and suspended sediment loads would drop to below 200 ppm, allowing chum, coho, winter steelhead and anadromous cutthroat trout to enter the river to spawn.
Some of these adults would be captured and used to further restoration efforts.
Work would again be stopped in April or May and continue for 80 to 100 days and suspended sediment would then drop to below 200 ppm (i.e. background levels).
Spring Chinook and summer steelhead adults would be able to enter the river and spawn during this period, although adults may be captured and used to help restoration efforts.
During dam removal, some outplanting of eggs or fry in the reaches of the Elwha upstream of the reservoirs is anticipated.
Juveniles resulting from these outplants would be able to migrate downstream following the completion of dam removal.
Vegetation
The dams and reservoirs cover a total 715 acres, 684 of which were inundated by the reservoirs.
This acreage includes more than 5 linear miles and 534 acres of low elevation riparian communities and natural wetlands, which are important in the cycling of water, nutrients, sediment, organic matter and aquatic and terrestrial organisms in the riverine ecosystem.
Wetlands and riparian vegetation also reduce the severity of flood events, act as a buffer to pollution sources entering the river and provide important fish habitat.
Pg. 22 = 14
Full vegetative recovery would take up to 100 years, assuming all measures identified in the Revegetation Plan (appendix 3) are implemented.
Within 3 years, vegetation would begin to appear natural, and be stabilized enough to mimic pre-dam levels of erosion within 6 to 10 years.
Wildlife
At least 22 wildlife species are known to feed on salmon carcasses, eggs or juveniles in rivers in this region.
The dams eliminated this source of food for these species from all but the lowest 4.9 miles.
In other river systems in the Pacific Northwest, interactions between anadromous fish and terrestrial wildlife communities are central components of ecosystem function, and therefore of the maintenance of regional biodiversity.
In the Elwha, it is estimated that salmon and steelhead would bring more than 800,000 pounds of biomass and 13,000 pounds of the essential nutrients nitrogen and phosphorus to the aquatic ecosystem if the dams were removed and natural ecosystem conditions fully restored.
Restoring habitat would be a major beneficial impact to most local wildlife species.
Species of Special Concern
The primary impact of the dams to species of special concern (threatened, endangered or rare) has been loss of habitat, although some have been affected by the loss of salmon as a food source.
The bald eagle is an example of the latter.
Removal of the dams and recovery of the rivers ecosystem would result in major beneficial impacts to the northern spotted owl, marble murrelet, Pacific fisher, harlequin duck, bull trout, Vauxs swift, pileated woodpecker and several rare amphibian species.
Dam removal would adversely affect some species in the short term, primarily through construction noise.
Murrelets and spotted owls may avoid the area if noise gets too loud.
Surveys to date have shown no murrelet nests close to the damsites, but two consecutive years of data collection are required to fulfill US Fish and Wildlife Service procedures.
If 1996 surveys confirm that there are no nests near the sites, mitigation would not be required.
If they find nearby nests, mitigation including noise reduction or changes in the sequencing and timing of construction activities would be developed.
Spotted owl surveys to date have not found nests near either dam, with the closest being nearly one mile from Glines Canyon Dam.
As a result, adverse effects on northern spotted owls are not expected.
Living Marine Resources
Different species of marine life now occupy the nearshore area by the Elwha River mouth than before the dams were built.
This is largely due to substrate changes resulting from the elimination of natural sediment transport.
Before the dams were built, it is likely that the substrate sizes were mixed and supported species like Dungeness crab, littleneck, butter, horse and geoduck clams, sand lance, surf smelt, eelgrass, and species of green algae.
These species are expected to return following dam removal.
Pg. 23 = pg. 15
Substrate is now composed of large-sized material (cobbles, boulders, etc.) and supports kelp, rockfish, greenling, red rock crab, and chitons.
This community of marine life would sustain moderate adverse impacts during dam removal as sand and gravel bury organisms, and silt and clay make the water turbid.
Over the long term, the increase in transport of sand and gravel would result in a major change in the substrate composition and associated biological community between the river mouth and the eroding bluffs to the east.
Future conditions, however, would approximate those that existed prior to dam construction.
This is true of both actions alternatives.
The Dredge and Slurry alternative would send less suspended material offshore via the river, and would instead deposit it in offshore waters 60 to 100 feet deep.
This location is preferred because currents are strong and would quickly disperse fine sediment, and reduce adverse impacts to marine life.
The return of natural sediment transport would help to restore beaches, which have become steepened in part because of the loss of sand from the Elwha River, and would help offset erosion of Ediz Hook.
Air Quality and Noise
Construction activities during dam removal would send minor amounts of traffic-related pollutants (i.e. ozone, carbon monoxide, sulfur dioxide and oxides of nitrogen), and some particulates into air in the immediate area.
Other sources of particulates in the Elwha basin include burns, pulp mill emissions, vehicles and campfire smoke, all of which affect visibility.
Construction-related sources of particulates would include the use of haul roads, loading and dumping, bulldozing, saw cutting, blasting and wind erosion of the exposed reservoir basins.
Emissions of particulate matter less than 10 microns (PM10) from these sources at Elwha Dam are expected to be about 105.3 tons, and at Glines Canyon Dam, about 25.2 tons over the 18-month to 2-year dam removal time period.
Although impacts would be temporary, dust along a portion of the dirt road entry into the Elwha damsite may moderately affect homeowners in the short term and require mitigation, such as spraying periodically with water, or paving the road.
Slightly greater particulate emissions are expected under the Dredge and Slurry alternative, as the pipeline would be buried for part of the route.
This would entail digging and burying, which would send dust into the air.
The amount is small enough that no measurable difference between the two alternatives is expected.
There are no homes or wildlife of special concern closer than 0.3 miles to either damsite.
Twenty residents live within 0.6 miles of Elwha Dam, 55 within 1.2 miles and 491 within 3 miles of the site.
Other than an employee residence at the dam, the closest homes to Glines Canyon Dam are 2 miles away, and four lie within a 3-mile radius.
Nests of species of special concern (marbled murrelets and/or Northern spotted owls) have been located 1 mile from Glines Canyon Dam, and 1.2 miles from Elwha Dam.
Pg. 24 = 16 
Continuous noise levels from construction equipment could have short-term (18 months to 2 years) minor adverse impacts on residents living within one-half mile of the Elwha Damsite, but would not be noticeable beyond 1.2 miles.
Ambient weather conditions and topography may reduce noise levels.
Species of special concern would not be affected.
Residents within 0.6 miles of Elwha Dam would periodically experience short durations of acute noise from intermittent blasting similar in intensity to that of moderate thunder.
Residents and wildlife beyond 1.2 miles would not be expected to experience blasting noise; predicted noise levels during the worst-case atmospheric conditions are all below or close to 120 decibels.
Both continuous and acute noise levels would be temporary and are considered negligible impacts.
At Glines Canyon Dam, pre-splitting and blasting during notching of the dam would produce about the same level of noise as at Elwha Dam, and would be the loudest actions at the site.
At a distance of 1 mile from the site, sound levels would have dropped to those comparable to distant thunder or lower.
At two miles, the distance of all residences except the one at the dam, the sound has no effect.
Actual noise levels could be up to 20 decibels less than those predicted due to attenuation provided by trees and terrain that were not considered in this assessment.
Traffic noise would be comparable to a logging truck and would occur primarily along routes already used frequently by such trucks.
Cultural Resources
The hydropower projects have become historic properties and both are on the National Register of Historic Places.
Removing them would mean the loss of the projects themselves, a major adverse effect under the National Historic Preservation Act.
However, mitigation in the form of documentation of their properties to the standards of the Historic American Engineering Record would offset this loss.
Also, some features of the Glines Canyon damsite would be left in place so that Olympic National Park could use them as a focus of interpretive activities in the future.
Because of these measures, the significance of the resources would be preserved, and impacts for the purposes of this EIS (i.e. under NEPA) would be reduced to minor.
The damming of the river has had a profound effect on the cultural resources of the Elwha Klallam people.
The Elwha Klallam have lived in and around the river valley for thousands of years, and their culture, spiritual traditions, and economy have become intermeshed with it and the resources it has traditionally provided.
These resources include the salmon and steelhead which filled the river before the dams were built.
Pg. 25 = 17
When the river was dammed, the quantity of fish in the river drastically declined.
Cultural resources important to the Lower Elwha Klallam, including the site on the river where they believe their people were created, were inundated or made inaccessible by the reservoirs or buried by the dams.
The damming of the river itself has had a major adverse impact on all of the cultural resources that a free-flowing river represent to the Elwha Klallam.
Only removing the dams would return these resources the natural flowing river, the abundant salmon and trout, and the irreplaceable cultural resources which lie along the river valley.
This would be a major beneficial impact of the proposed action.
Removing the dams could adversely affect some historic sites, because the river is expected to both meander and experience an increase in flood stage over what it does now.
Particularly at risk are those sites such as the Elwha Ranger Station Historic District and the Altaire and Elwha campgrounds kitchen shelters which have been built in the floodplain since the dams were constructed.
These same resources may be affected by road widening or staging for construction as well.
Minor impacts to cultural sites may occur as a result of rubble disposal.
The agencies cooperating in the production of this DEIS, as well as other agencies, have signed an agreement which prescribes monitoring and mitigation for impacts to cultural resources.
The types of mitigation include surveys, avoidance, and documentation of the features of a resource if it will be affected.
Because of the mitigation spelled out in the agreement, adverse impacts to cultural resources would be minor.
The proposed action and the Dredge and Slurry alternative are expected to have similar impacts to cultural resources, except for those potentially caused by trenching to lay the pipeline if it follows an alignment along county roads.
With mitigation, these additional adverse impacts to cultural resources would be minor.
Socioeconomics
The economic benefits of dam removal far exceed the costs.
Marked benefits would be derived from additional recreation, tourism, and sport fishing expected in the area after the dam removal, totaling $164 million over the 100 years of project life (at a 3% rate of discount).
While data underlying nonmarket estimates of value are more variable than market estimates, the nonmarket value of restoring the Elwha River salmon and steelhead fisheries and returning the ecosystem to its natural state has been estimated at $3.5 billion per year over ten years (Loomis 1995).
Activity associated with the removal of the dams would generate between 1,150 and 1,240 jobs in Clallam County during the approximate 10 years of pre-construction, construction and restoration involved in implementing the project.
This, in turn, would generate an estimated $60-$65 million in business activity and another $32 to $34 million of personal income locally.
After restoration is complete, 446 permanent jobs and a corresponding annual payroll of $4.6 million would be generated in the Clallam County recreation and tourism sector.
Increases in the workforce are not expected to generate any significant change in the need for public services.
Pg. 26 = pg. 18
The proposed action is estimated to cost $111.1 million, and the Dredge and Slurry Alternative, $124.4 million.
These cost estimates may decline at final design stages.
Public Health and Safety
Three variables: overall dam safety, potential for damage due to earthquakes and impacts from hazardous material were analyzed.
Although Glines Canyon Dam is considered strong enough to withstand even a probable maximum flood or major earthquake, a recent Department of the Interior pre-acquisition inspection of Elwha Dam noted such "remotely occurring events" may cause "a dam deficiency" (DOI et al. 1995).
The probability of an earthquake on either shallow crustal faults in the area or deeper subduction faults is unknown, but is probably remote.
Because damage to downstream residents in the event of dam failure would be great, the dams are rated as having high hazard potential.
Special care would be taken during the removal of the Elwha Dam to ensure there is not a failure from the dam foundation as occurred during its construction in 1912.
A series of cofferdams and other measures are integrated into the removal design to ensure public health and safety during dam removal.
Asbestos, PCBs, and chemicals such as fuels, paints, lubricants, and pesticides were found in the project area.
These are contained in soil, transformers, wiring, associated buildings, and batteries at both powerhouses.
The areas would be cleaned up by remediating and removing the contaminated materials from the dams and associated buildings and transporting them offsite to a licensed hazardous waste dumpsite under either action alternative.
Traffic
Impacts to traffic would occur as a result of trucks carrying equipment and personnel to and from the site, and carrying rubble and waste material away.
They would last only during the construction period, and would peak during the final 7 months of Elwha Dam demolition.
Nine different waste disposal areas were analyzed.
Traffic information generated for 13 major intersections through which trucks would need to pass was also assessed.
The addition of project traffic would cause only one intersection to decline in its level of service (LOS) rating during peak hours.
Two construction years were analyzed, 2000 and 2005.
Assuming the maximum number of trucks entering and leaving the Elwha Damsite (16 trips per hour 8 each way) during the year 2005, the intersection rating of US 101 and SR 112 would fall during the peak traffic hour from LOS B to LOS C.
This means the time spent stopped or delayed at the signal at this intersection would increase from a range of 5 to 15 seconds up to a range of 15 to 25 seconds.
This impact is minor and temporary.
Pg. 27 = pg. 19
Impacts from project traffic to all other intersections during peak hour traffic on both weekends and weekdays would be negligible.
There may be concerns about truck traffic entering the highways from the site access points at Power Plant Road and Olympic Hot Springs Road.
As a safety measure, flaggers may be used at these intersections to facilitate the introduction of trucks to the busy arterial roadways.
Indian Trust Resources
The dams have harmed resources secured to the Elwha Klallam and other tribes under the Treaty of Point No Point, and the Treaty with the Makah, signed in 1855.
Under these treaties, tribes retained the right to take up to one-half of the harvestable fin and shellfish returning to usual and accustomed fishing places (except for "staked or cultivated beds").
The dams have reduced the number of harvestable fish to near zero (without hatcheries, all native anadromous runs would likely eventually die out), and greatly reduced both sandy substrate and the Elwha estuary beneficial to shellfish.
Both of these impacts are major and adverse, although impacts to shellfish have not been quantified.
In addition, the federal government is obliged to protect Indian trust or restricted lands in the Elwha River drainage.
The near-elimination of sediment transport beyond the dams has resulted in major erosion of tribal beaches.
Also, the risk of failure of Elwha Dam (from very large earthquakes or floods) is unknown, but considered unacceptable by the tribe at this time until further safety analyses are completed.
Removing the dams and draining the reservoirs would restore conditions under which fish and shellfish would flourish, eliminate the risk of Lower Elwha Klallam Reservation flooding from dam failure, and reverse reservation beach erosion.
Either action alternative would uphold the federal trust responsibility, and have major beneficial impacts to resources subject to it.
The No Action alternative would continue major adverse impacts to these same resources and would not uphold the federal trust responsibility.
Recreation
Local residents use both reservoirs for fishing and boating and the loss of this recreational resource would be a major impact to them.
Nearby lakes, such as Lake Crescent and Lake Sutherland, are expected to accommodate users from Lake Aldwell and Mills, and would be slightly more crowded as a result.
Out of town visitors would only experience a minor impact because of the availability of other lakes in the area.
During construction (about two years), the Elwha subdistrict of Olympic National Park would be closed to visitors.
This would impact an estimated 140,000 (1993) to 170,000 (1994) visitors using the Elwha River valley inside the park each year, including hikers, campers, sightseers, picnickers, fishers, boaters, horseback riders, and backpackers.
Shuttle service in the valley would mitigate some of this impact.
Restrictions on sport fishing during dam removal and restoration of native anadromous salmon and trout may adversely affect both marine and in-river recreational fishers for up to a decade or more in some cases.
Pg. 28 = pg. 21
In the long term, both the River Erosion alternative and the Dredge and Slurry alternative would increase river recreational opportunities and would have a major beneficial impact on salmon and steelhead sport fishing in the Elwha River valley and Clallam County.
Land Use
Use of lands associated with the Glines Canyon hydropower project is inconsistent with policies governing land use inside Olympic National Park.
These policies are designed for lands either designated as wilderness or that are in a relatively natural state.
When the dams are removed, the park would maintain some features of the damsite for their interpretive value but otherwise the land would be revegetated and managed for backcountry/wilderness uses.
This would conform with National Park Service policies and would be a permanent beneficial impact.
The objectives of several regional and local land use plans would also be achieved.
Lands associated with the Elwha hydropower project are outside park boundaries and are designated by the Elwha Restoration Act to revert to one of four managers.
Two of these (the US Fish and Wildlife Service and the Washington Department of Natural Resources) are not interested in acquiring and managing the lands, particularly if access to the river is maintained.
The third, Olympic National Park has stated the lands qualify for inclusion in the park, but is not pursuing their inclusion in the park.
The fourth party, the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe, is interested in managing the lands and has proposed some use of the lands away from the river for natural resource management, housing, and/or economic development.
Any land manager is required by the Elwha Restoration Act to protect fisheries and ecosystem restoration.
Disposing of over 210,000 cubic yards of concrete and fill materials and 730 tons of mechanical and electrical equipment from the demolished dams would permanently commit land to this use, but may reclaim sites unusable now (such as surface gravel mines).
Aesthetics
The dams and associated hydropower facilities are out of character with the surrounding landscape at both sites, and contrast in form, color and texture with that landscape.
Removing the dams and draining the reservoirs would expose two large, flat expanses visible to visitors and/or passengers along Highway 101.
Dust from the lakebeds would impair visibility during windy days until vegetation takes hold (the year after the reservoirs are drained).
As time passes, vegetation would become more varied and the area would eventually begin to appear natural.
If shorelines and other upland areas are revegetated as proposed, the sites would return to the climax forest stage within several decades.
Purpose and Need
Introduction
In the early 1900s, the free-flowing Elwha River on the Olympic Peninsula in Washington State was blocked by two hydroelectric dams (see figure 2).
The Elwha Dam was built, beginning in September 1910, 4.9 miles from the mouth of the Elwha River.
It impounded the reservoir known as Lake Aldwell.
Construction on Glines Canyon Dam, 8.5 miles farther upstream, began in 1926, creating the reservoir known as Lake Mills.
Built without fish passage facilities, the dams blocked the upstream migration path for all species of native anadromous salmon and trout that had used the river for spawning and rearing.
They also interrupted the downstream movement of sediments (gravel, sand, etc.) needed for spawning and, through inundation, destroyed additional river habitat important for salmon and trout.
Pg. 29 = pg. 23
The dams supplied some of the first electrical power to Port Angeles and the Olympic Peninsula, and are now devoted entirely to supplying a portion (38%) of the power needs for a pulp and paper mill in Port Angeles, Washington, currently owned by the Daishowa America Corporation.
In 1968 Crown Zellerbach, the owner and operator of the dams at that time, submitted an application to license the Elwha Dam and in 1973 submitted an application to relicense the Glines Canyon Dam with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (commission).
Licensing was controversial and a number of parties challenged the commissions jurisdiction to relicense the Glines Canyon Dam, primarily because of its location in Olympic National Park.
Congress responded to the controversy by enacting Public Law 102-495, the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act, in October 1992 (see figure 3).
The act both directed the secretary of the interior to study ways to fully restore the native anadromous fisheries and ecosystem of the Elwha River and suspended the licensing process.
The secretarys Elwha Report was submitted to congress in 1994.
In it, the secretary determined that removing the dams was both feasible and necessary to fully restore the fisheries and ecosystem and to promote the federal trust responsibility for affected Indian tribes.
While the Elwha Report reached certain conclusions about potential river restoration, further evaluation of issues, alternatives, and potential impacts would assist the secretary of the interior in making a final decision.
A full range of alternatives to the proposed removal of both dams, and the environmental impact of each alternative, were analyzed in the Department of the Interior environmental impact statement, titled Elwha River Ecosystem Restoration (referred to in this document as the programmatic EIS).
This document was finalized in June 1995.
It incorporated the Elwha Report by reference, and adopted large sections of a Federal Energy Regulatory Commission draft environmental impact statement (updated and retitled Draft Staff Report in 1993) prepared in review of licensing the power plants.
The important information needed to make a policy decision whether to restore the ecosystem through dam removal is contained in these three documents.
FIGURE 2.
Project Area (SCAN)
FIGURE 3.
Sequence of Documents and Events Leading to this EIS
To give the secretary a range of feasible options for implementing the choice of removing both dams, the Department of the Interior and cooperating agencies prepared this second environmental impact statement, referred to as the Implementation EIS throughout this document.
Pg. 30 = pg. 26
This environmental impact statement is divided in five sections.
The first is Purpose and Need, which examines the existing problems the federal government is trying to solve by taking action.
The second is a description of Alternatives, including those considered but rejected.
The third is Affected Environment, which describes those parts of the physical, natural, and cultural environment that are either affected now (i.e., by the No Action alternative) or expected to be affected if action is taken.
The fourth is the Impacts section, organized by impact topic (e.g., Fluvial Processes, Water Quality).
Under each impact topic is a summary of applicable regulations and policies and a description of methods used to predict impacts.
This summary is followed by a description of the impacts of No Action i.e., the dams remain in place.
Next the impacts of the action alternatives are described.
First is the proposed action, referred to as the River Erosion alternative, and next is the second action alternative, Dredge and Slurry.
Cumulative impacts, or additive effects of other sources of impact, are combined and summarized once under each impact topic for all three alternatives.
Finally, the consultation and Coordination section describes public involvement and preparers of this document.
Purpose and Need for Action
Regional Context
Populations of the five species of Pacific salmon (coho, Chinook, sockeye, pink, and chum), as well as seagoing trout such as the steelhead, have been declining over the last century, in some cases drastically.
An estimated 30 million salmon and searun trout migrated as spawning adults from the Pacific Ocean to rivers and lakes along the United States west coast a century ago.
Today the annual return is 5 to 10% of that number, with salmon and searun trout extinct in a quarter of their former range and at risk of extinction in another half.
In addition, hatchery-bred salmon, which tend to be poorly adapted to stresses of the natural environment, make up 60 to 90% of the returns to western spawning streams (Sims 1994).
Many anadromous fish stocks are in trouble; the American Fisheries Society reports more than 100 Pacific salmon stocks are already extinct and 214 are at moderate or high risk.
All Pacific salmon and anadromous trout are either under status review or proposed for listing as threatened or endangered under the Endangered Species Act.
In the Columbia River, numbers of salmon have fallen from an estimated 16 million a century ago, to 1.2 million in 1993.
This is despite extensive hatchery operations and fish passage measures at Columbia River dams.
Fewer than 2,000 adult salmon made it up the Snake River to Idaho in 1994, compared with 10 times that number as recently as four years previously.
The Snake is dammed with four large dams.
Snake River sockeye are classified as endangered, and two runs of Snake River Chinook are threatened.
In the Elwha River, biologists believe the runs of both pink and sockeye salmon are endangered or extinct.
Elwha River spring chinook return only in very small numbers, if at all.
Coastal coho and coastal steelhead trout are proposed for listing under the Endangered Species Act.
The National Marine Fisheries Service has classified coastal coho stocks of Washington and Oregon as "threatened," while steelhead trout are still under review.
Puget Sound (including those from the Elwha River) and Lower Columbia River area coho are candidate species for federal listing.
Pg. 31 = pg. 27
Commercial salmon and steelhead catches in the Northwest, which once topped 200 million pounds per year, fell to 61 million pounds in 1988, yet the industry still supported 60,000 jobs and $1.25 billion in commercial and sport fishing income.
Now, annual catches are only an estimated 20 million pounds (Satchell 1994).
The decline prompted an unprecedented move by the Pacific Fishery Management Council to completely ban salmon fishing off the coast of Washington and set strict limits on commercial and recreational fishing off Oregon and California in the spring and summer of 1994.
Washington ocean fishing for chinook continued to be severely restricted in 1995, and a low quota (130,000) for Washington coho was set.
In conjunction with these actions, federal fishing "disaster relief" money ($15.7 million in 1994) was dispatched by congress to aid fishing-dependent communities.
The causes for the decline are numerous.
In some cases, it is overfishing.
Conditions in the marine environment, such as the warm water current known as El Nino, may also affect populations on a large scale.
Destruction of freshwater habitat that fish require for spawning also has been a dominant factor in reducing or eliminating runs.
In streams, increased sediment loads from logging, dredging for gold, and from the building and use of roads coats and smothers eggs.
Logging to a rivers edge eliminates streamside vegetation essential for successful hatching or rearing for some species.
Dams affect habitat by holding back necessary spawning gravel, altering flow patterns, and inundating stream habitat.
Reservoir water released over the spillways is often too warm and has too little oxygen or too much nitrogen conditions that lead to disease or death in downstream fish populations.
Water diversions for municipal, industrial, and agricultural use can limit downstream spawning and add pesticides or other pollutants that stress fish.
The crowded and unnatural conditions in most hatcheries are associated with disease and produce fish ill-adapted to the natural environment.
On the Columbia-Snake system, losses associated with the fish passage measures and the dams and reservoirs are considered responsible for the low returns of salmon and steelhead.
The dams kill 85 to 95% of migrating smolts on their way to sea, and between 34 and 57% of adults returning to spawn (Sims 1994).
This is despite an estimated $1.5 billion spent over the last 13 years to implement fish passage measures (Satchell 1994).
Elwha River
Most of the habitat of the Elwha River is in excellent condition, because 83% of the watershed lies within Olympic National Park and is managed to maintain natural conditions.
This is unusual, because most rivers in the western United States are either highly developed along their banks or their water is heavily used and often polluted.
In contrast, water in the Elwha is considered Class AA, of "extraordinary" quality, by the state of Washington.
However, for more than 80 years, the Elwha Dam has prevented passage of the Elwha Rivers 10 runs of salmon and anadromous trout beyond the first 5 miles of river.
In addition, both dams prevent the natural transport of gravel, sand, and other sediment downstream, rendering the lower 13.5 miles of the river largely unusable for spawning fish.
This stretch of river is also unnaturally heated in late summer and early fall, because surface releases from the reservoirs raise the temperature of the stream.
The water is largely devoid of the organic debris and minerals it once contained from salmon carcasses decaying upstream.
This has reduced productivity, including that of insects and aquatic invertebrates that serve as food for the salmon and trout.
Although the Elwha River once supported an estimated 300,000 to 400,000 wild salmon and seagoing trout annually, fewer than 3,000 return today.
Instead of occupying 70 miles of high quality river, populations of mostly hatchery fish crowd in the lower 4.9 miles, where they exist in unnatural and poor conditions.
Pg. 32 = pg. 28
Through the elimination of salmon in the middle and upper river, the dams have altered the Elwha River aquatic and upland ecosystem as well.
The hundreds of thousands of salmon and trout that once occupied the river served as a year-round dependable food source for at least 22 species of wildlife.
Salmon carcasses contribute as much as 40% of the body weight of aquatic insects and small fish in spawning rivers (Sims 1994); these are near the bottom of an extensive food chain connecting the river and land-based ecologies.
The reservoirs have flooded more than 5 miles of stream and riparian vegetation and the dams have held back natural sediment transport.
This has fundamentally altered the river morphology and "armored" the remainder of the Elwha riverbed downstream of Glines Canyon Dam.
Gravel and sand once occupied the riverbeds and provided habitat for insects, aquatic species, and spawning salmon.
The higher natural sediment loads made the river more dynamic; river channels changed locations and vegetation was scoured from banks and floodplains.
Now, well-vegetated islands, low aquatic productivity, and degraded, channelized river are the norm below the dams.
Beyond their impact to the river ecology and anadromous fisheries, the dams have altered the rivers estuary and nearshore marine environment, contributing to the erosion and steepening of beaches to the east, eliminating habitat for wildlife several of them are now species of special concern (i.e. proposed or on federal or state lists of threatened and endangered species), and fundamentally changing the characteristics of the river morphology (see Impacts of No Action in this document for more information).
The reservoirs have covered cultural resources of great importance to the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe, including the site where the Elwha Klallam believe their people were created.
In addition to making cultural resources inaccessible, the dams affected the tribe by causing significant declines in harvestable fish, a resource promised in perpetuity by the federal government when it took control of tribal lands in the 1855 Treaty of Point No Point.
The tribe considers the free-flowing river and its salmon to be cultural resources; these resources were spiritual and cultural centers over the thousands of years its people lived in the Elwha valley.
Damming the Elwha and eliminating its abundant wild fish runs severely affected the tribe, and have contributed to a legacy of socioeconomic problems that persist today, including unemployment, poor health, and very low income.
Also, although the chance of dam failure (from earthquake or other rare events) is low, the hazard potential for reservation (and other) residents downstream is high if such a failure occurs.
Pg. 33 = pg. 30
Need for Federal Action
The dams and reservoirs on the Elwha have been and continue to be the primary source of impact on the rivers anadromous fish, aquatic ecology, and cultural resources.
Since the bulk of the watershed is undeveloped and relatively pristine, removing the dams would restore fish, the rivers ecosystem processes, and cultural resources to the Elwha Klallam people, and promote the federal trust responsibility to the tribe.
No other river in the Pacific Northwest region has the unique, pristine habitat of the upper reaches of the Elwha River basin.
Based on evidence summarized above about ecological and cultural effects of the Elwha and Glines Canyon dams, and the uniqueness of this system in a region wide context, the secretary of the interior has determined that the dams will be removed and the Elwha River ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries fully restored.
The proposal at this time is to remove both dams in a safe, environmentally sound, and cost-effective manner.
Proposed Action River Erosion Alternative
The proposed action is to restore the Elwha River ecosystem and native anadromous fisheries by removing both dams over a two-year period and implementing fish restoration and revegetation plans.
Lake Mills would initially be drawn down with Glines Canyon Dam in place to provide flood control until a diversion channel to drain Lake Aldwell is finished; chances of delaying the construction of the diversion channel at the Elwha Dam would be reduced during high flow periods.
Cofferdams would allow fill material upstream of Elwha Dam to be removed while dry and prevent foundation failure similar to the one that occurred while Lake Aldwell was being filled in 1912.
Elwha Dam would then be removed by controlled blasting, and Glines Canyon Dam by a combination of controlled blasting and diamond-wire saw cutting of concrete blocks.
Sediment would be managed by river erosion.
Details of this alternative, the proposed action, as well as the second action alternative which relies on dredging and slurrying fines for sediment control are described in the Alternatives chapter.
Relationship to Other Planning Documents
This environmental impact statement is referred to throughout as the Implementation EIS.
Interiors previous programmatic EIS (June 1995) examined four action alternatives, as well as the No Action alternative.
No Action was defined as leaving the projects in place, without fish passage.
The action alternatives explored single dam removal scenarios, installing state-of-the-art fish passage at both dams, and the proposed action of removing both dams.
The programmatic EIS was based on information in two previous documents, as well as information developed since those documents were published.
These documents are the Elwha Report to Congress, prepared by the US Departments of Interior and Commerce and the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe, submitted to Congress in 1994; and a draft environmental impact statement prepared by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission in review of licensing the two hydropower projects.
The commissions environmental impact statement was updated and retitled Draft Staff Report in March 1993, and was adopted in large part in preparing interiors programmatic EIS.
The Elwha Report was prepared in response to congressional direction in Public Law 102-495, the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act, to study options and select a plan to fully restore the river ecosystem and its native anadromous fisheries.
Pg. 34 = 31
The programmatic EIS gave the secretary of the interior several options for partial restoration, the No Action option, and the option of full restoration through dam removal.
It analyzed the impacts of each policy decision, but noted that specifics of dam removal, sediment management, mitigation, land disposition and use, revegetation, and fisheries recovery would be further analyzed in a second environmental impact statement which would be geared to implement the approach chosen by the secretary.
This document is that second, Implementation EIS.
It is procedurally connected (tiered) to the programmatic EIS titled Elwha River Ecosystem Restoration.
Issues and Concerns
Issues and concerns are potential environmental problems that may result from the federal action, if it is taken.
Issues were initially identified by the public, and by specialists in the National Park Service, US Bureau of Reclamation, US Fish and Wildlife Service, US Army Corps of Engineers, and from the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe.
A team of scientists and engineers from the agencies and the tribe, referred to as the EIS team in this document, collected and analyzed data on the potential for impacts on an extensive list of environmental resources.
This list was supplemented with public input from two scooping sessions held in the fall of 1994, and with written comments collected from agencies and the general public during the 60-day review period for the programmatic EIS.
Most environmental problems from dam removal would be short-term, lasting from six months to three years.
Some will be longer term or permanent.
A summary of impacts is found at the end of the Alternatives chapter.
A summary of issues and specific impact topics analyzed in this document is presented in table 3.
Pgs. 34-41 = pgs. 32-37
Table 3.
Substantive Issues and Concerns Analyzed in this EIS
RESOURCE OF CONCERN
SUBSTANTIVE ISSUES
IMPACT TOPICS REQUIRING DETAILED ANALYSIS
Sediment About 17.7 million cubic yards of clay, silt, sand, gravel, and cobbles have accumulated behind the dams, and much (less than half) of it would be released as a result of dam removal
There would be the potential for increases in flooding from riverbed aggradation after dams are removed Impacts to reservoir area through time
Impacts to river morphology in downstream channel, delta area and beaches
Impact on and measures to protect downstream land uses and structures including homes, cultural resources, wells, and existing levees Surface Water Releasing stored sediment would result in increases in turbidity, manganese and/or iron into surface water during dam removal, and increased spikes in turbidity after the dams are removed Impact of river water quality
Impact on and measures to protect Port Angeles industrial users (Daishowa and Rayonier mills) and state rearing facility
Impact on and measures to protect Tribal fish hatchery Groundwater During dam removal fine sediment may infiltrate aquifers, increase turbidity and decrease yield
Increased dissolved manganese and/or iron may change water quality
Increased flood stage may change well water quality and quantity
Change in groundwater levels may change downstream septic systems
Increases in bedload may change well yields, either through wider meanders away from collection systems, or by burying existing riverbed collection systems Impacts to and measures to protect from increased turbidity: Port Angeles water supply and Dry Creek Water Association wells; Lower Elwha Klallam Tribal Fish Hatchery; other users
Impacts to and measures to protect from increases in manganese and iron: Port Angeles, Dry Creek Water Association and Elwha Place Homeowners Association
Impacts to and measures to protect from changes of water table levels to Lower Elwha valley users
Impacts to and measures to protect from increased flood potential: Elwha Place Homeowners Association and wells in the floodplain Native Anadromous and Resident Fisheries The restoration potential, and time to restore each stock after dam removal varies, and depends on stock availability, fishing pressure and habitat
Fish habitat would change in the long term following dam removal
Reintroduction of salmon would increase competition with resident trout
Release of fine sediment during dam removal would kill fish exposed to it, coat and kill eggs and potentially cause in-migrating adults to avoid entering the river Assessment of stock availability, habitat and fishing pressure on chinook (summer/fall and spring), coho, steelhead (summer and winter), pink, chum, sockeye, steelhead, sea-run cutthroat trout, and native char
Long-term impacts from dam removal to habitat downstream of dams; restoration of inundated areas to riverine habitat; impacts to resident species
Short-term impacts to and protection from turbidity for above stocks Vegetation Areas occupied by the reservoirs or dams would revegetate following removal
Some small changes in existing vegetation would occur during or following removal General acreages of vegetation types which would return following dam removal; specific impacts to riparian and upland communities and wetlands; revegetation plans
Wetlands associated with reservoir shorelines; upland vegetation removed to facilitate dam removal, waste disposal Wildlife Revegetated areas would provide wildlife habitat; restored salmon would be a source of prey and nutrients for wildlife
Loss of reservoir habitat would adversely affect trumpeter swans and ducks which use it Impacts on terrestrial ecosystem; wildlife overall; elk and other large mammals; trumpeter swans, lesser scaup and diving ducks; fish eating mammals, raptors, and other birds; amphibians Species of Special Concern Site-specific effects from dam removal (noise, dust, human activity)
Change in existing habitat and long-term restoration of riverine, riparian, wetland and upland habitat Impact on four federally listed threatened species, and one endangered species (listed respectively):
-bald eagle
-northern spotted owl
-marbled murrelet
-Stellar sea lion
-peregrine falcon (endangered)
Impact on six species that are candidates for federal listing, and five species that are candidates for state listing (listed respectively):
-Pacific fisher
-Harlequin duck
-Northern goshawk
-Cascades frog
-Northern red-legged frog
-Bull trout
-Pileated woodpecker
-Common loon
-Van Dykes salamander
-Vauxs swift
-Golden eagle
Impact on six sensitive plant species Living Marine Resources High turbidities at the river mouth during removal would kill or harm some marine life in the short-term
Replacement of rocky nearshore marine substrate with a mixture of substrates would change the species make-up over time
Restored sediment transport would restore the size and complexity of the Elwha delta and estuary over the long term Impact on nearshore marine community (including direct and indirect effects on macroalgae (kelp) and indirect effects on rockfish, greenling, red rock crab, chitons, clam species and cragon shrimp)
Long-term impacts to species dependent on sandy or mixed substrate (Dungeness crab, littleneck, butter, horse and geoduck clams, sand lance, surf smelt, eelgrass, and species of green algae)
Impacts to deltas and estuary Air Quality Construction dust would increase over background during dam removal Impacts to air quality in and around the damsites during their removal from increases in PM10 and TSP
Impacts to local residents from dust and construction activity Ambient Noise Level Ambient noise levels would increase during construction, and may be heard by residents or wildlife Impacts on local residents and park visitors from increased continuous noise levels (dBA) as dams are removed
Impacts to above from acute instances of loud noise (such as blasting)
Impacts of and protection from noise on species of special concern (marbled murrelets and Northern spotted owls) Cultural Resources Removal of the hydroelectric projects means the loss of two historic resources
Cultural resources in or near the floodplain may experience increased flooding or erosion from aggradation and increased surface water elevation during and following dam removal
Construction activities, road grading, trenching to bury the slurry pipeline and offsite disposal of dam rubble could damage known or unknown cultural resources
Draining the reservoirs and removing the dams may uncover cultural resources now inaccessible to members of the Low Elwha Klallam Tribe Construction-related impacts and mitigation of these impacts to the hydroelectric projects; to cultural resources now inundated or buried by projects, including the tribes cleansing site, prophecy hole, and creation site; to cultural resources potentially affected by waste disposal or road grading
Impacts from increased flooding or erosion and mitigation of these impacts to resources in the floodplain (Elwha Ranger Station Historic District, Elwha River bridge, CCC community kitchens in Altaire and Elwha campgrounds; archeological sites, cultural landscapes, or culturally sensitive areas Socioeconomics Changes in the existing local and regional socioeconomic characteristics, such as employment sectors, may result from dam and reservoir removal
Daishowa Mill would need a replacement source of power and costs for that power may change as a result
Restoring fisheries in the Elwha River would increase commercial income from salmon fishing for tribal and non-tribal fishers
Supplying workers for a 10-year period of preparation, construction and restoration may change the demand for local housing and public services Impacts to county economic tax base; increases in jobs, payroll and business activity during the construction period; long-term impacts to Clallam County businesses from recreation and tourism dollars
Impacts to real cost of providing replacement power to Daishowa Mill; impacts to municipal power users
Impacts to public infrastructure/housing
Impacts on annual net business benefits from dam removal and fishery restoration
Impacts on tribal social and economic conditions
Impacts to social values
Impacts on nonmarket benefits from dam removal and fishery restoration Public Health and Safety The dams may present a safety risk to downstream residents due to earthquakes
If removed improperly, the dams may present a safety risk to workers, visitors, residents and others using the river corridor.
A failure of the fill under Elwha Dam due to hydrostatic pressure of the reservoir is of particular concern
Some hazardous wastes exist at the damsites, and may pose risk to health and safety of workers and the general public Risk and impacts posed to downstream residents by dam failure during shallow, deep and megathrust earthquakes
Risk of failure during probable maximum flood or maximum credible earthquake given safety and strengthening measures already taken
Impacts on and measures to protect workers, visitors, and others using the river corridor from sudden increases in water levels as dams are removed
Impacts on and measures to protect workers and the general public from exposure to hazardous wastes found in dam-related structures as they are removed Transportation Removing dam rubble, and transporting personnel, equipment and supplies in and out of the damsites would increase traffic volume and congestion at intersections Impacts on local road conditions from heavy equipment during dam removal
Impacts on level of service at key intersections and road corridors from increased traffic volumes during dam removal Indian Trust Resources The dams adversely affect the federal governments responsibility to protect tribal resources Impacts of dam removal and fisheries restoration and restoration of shellfish as a tribal resource by estuary expansion and return of sandy nearshore substrate
Impacts of restoring wildlife habitat for game
Elimination of dams as a potential safety hazard Recreation In the long term, water-related uses of the Elwha River valley would change from reservoir and river, to those associated with the river
Fishing would be restricted in short term, but would increase in the long term as salmon and steelhead return
Recreationists using the Elwha Sub-district of the park would need to find alternative locations during dam construction, because the sites would be closed to visitors Impacts on recreation facilities, including the reservoirs
Impacts on recreational fishing, including flat water, residential trout and sport fishing for salmon and steelhead
Impacts on other recreational activities, including white-water boating; recreational fishing; camping; hiking; recreational facilities and wildlife observation Land Use The hydroelectric facilities conflict with numerous agency plans, and do not conform with neighboring land use
Olympic National Park would acquire and manage lands now occupied by Lake Mills and Glines Canyon Dam facilities
Future land managers of the Lake Aldwell lands may use or develop the lands.
This use or development would affect vegetation, wildlife, air quality, cultural resources, recreation, traffic flow, aesthetics, water quality and/or fisheries
Rubble and other waste from dam removal would restrict future use of land Impacts to Olympic National Park from management of acquired Glines Canyon lands
Impacts from future management of Lake Aldwell lands on land ownership, use and resources if Olympic National Park, US Fish and Wildlife Service, Washington State or the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe acquires
Impacts from waste disposal Aesthetic Resources The appearance of uncovered reservoir land in the short-term is of concern
Long-term management of the restored landscape is important to visitors, recreationists, land managers, etc.
Impacts on project area landscape from removal of dams and related structures and restoration of the river corridor
Impacts on management of aesthetic resources after dams and reservoirs are removed
Pg. 42 = 38
Issues Dismissed From Further Analysis
Sediment Management
Scoping comments were received suggesting further investigation of land disposal of the fine sediment instead of slurrying and of selling or using dredged fines as a soil amendment.
Land disposal of sediment was considered, but eliminated because of problems in trying to contain fine sediment.
The land area required would be enormous, sediments would be saturated, and the cost of slurrying or trucking the fines would be prohibitive.
Additional details on the reasons for eliminating this as an alternative are in the Alternatives chapter, Alternatives Considered but Rejected section.
Scoping comments also were received on stabilization of sediment by mechanical means (see Alternatives considered but rejected section).
Water Quantity and Quality
Water quality parameters affected by the action alternatives are analyzed in the Impacts section of this document; the Affected Environment section presents water quality statistics for the Elwha River.
The water quality parameters dropped from further detailed analysis (as largely irrelevant in this document) are hardness, alkalinity, dissolved solids, nitrate nitrogen, ammonia nitrogen, total phosphorous, ortho phosphorous, and radio nuclides.
Commentors asked that alternative sources of water (such as Morse Creek) be investigated.
Responses to these concerns are found in the programmatic EIS.
Many mitigation measures were examined.
Some were carried forward for additional analyses, and these appear in the Impacts to Surface Water and/or Groundwater sections of this document.
Some were dropped as unnecessary as further data were collected, and some eliminated for cost reasons (BOR 1995a, 1995b).
Native Anadromous and Resident Fisheries
Scoping comments on fish passage measures in lieu of removal of the dams were analyzed in the programmatic EIS.
The preferred (and ultimately selected) alternative in that document was the full restoration of the native anadromous fisheries and ecosystem through the removal of both dams; therefore, further analysis of fish passage measures in lieu of dam removal is outside the scope of this Implementation EIS.
Living Marine Resources
Scoping comments were received suggesting the dam rubble be used to build an artificial reef in the Strait of Juan de Fuca or that rubble be transported to other areas to build habitat for marine resources.
At this time, it appears that the costs of implementing this option outweighed the potential benefits to living marine resources.
It is not further analyzed in this EIS, although the dam removal contractor may wish to explore possible beneficial re-use of this dam rubble.
Pg. 43 = 39
Air Quality and Climate
The two air quality parameters most relevant to the proposed action and alternatives are total fine particulates (PM[10]) and total suspended particles; these are fully analyzed in this document.
All other air quality parameters were analyzed for potential impacts and deemed inconsequential, with no measurable changes to local or regional climatic conditions; therefore, this issue was dismissed from detailed analysis.
Socioeconomics
Housing and public infrastructure were assessed for the ability to accommodate the short-term workforce population and determined to be adequate; therefore, this issue was dropped from further detailed analysis.
Power Generation
Comments were received during the scoping period about co-generation of power, reducing the mills energy requirements, and using alternative sources of power.
These issues were addressed in the final programmatic EIS (DOI et at.
1995), Response to Comments, and therefore are not discussed further in this Implementation EIS.
Land Use
The state of Washington and the US Fish and Wildlife Service explored the potential of managing Lake Aldwell project lands after dam removal, but have no desire to pursue ownership.
The lands qualify for inclusion in Olympic National Park and as trust lands for the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe.
Therefore, impacts from potential ownership of these project lands from entities other than the National Park Service or Tribe are considered outside the scope of this document.
Planning Goals and Objectives
The Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act identified full restoration of the Elwha River native anadromous fisheries and ecosystem as its primary goals.
In this Implementation EIS, full restoration of the native anadromous fisheries and ecosystem remain primary goals.
In addition, the EIS team formulated additional broad goals and more specific objectives based on scientific, regulatory, policy and legal requirements.
All alternatives had to meet these goals and objectives to be considered reasonable.
The goals are presented below, and a list of specific objectives is available in the National Park Service file for this project.
Major Goals in Taking Action 1.
Fully restore native anadromous fisheries 2.
Fully restore the Elwha River ecosystem 3.
Maintain and protect existing municipal and industrial water quality against adverse impacts of dam removal 4.
Within Olympic National Park conserve, maintain and restore those ecological relationships, components and processes that would prevail if not for the advent of modern civilization 5.
Outside park boundaries (i.e. Lake Aldwell acquired lands), restore the pre-dam river corridor landscape for ecosystem restoration and for ceremonial and other tribal purposes 6.
Maintain public access to the river (on park and non-park lands) as consistent with fish and habitat restoration programs 7.
Protect or mitigate impacts to important cultural resources 8.
Restore access to viable Elwha River fisheries secured by predecessors to the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe by the Treaty of Point No Point 9.
Maintain present level of flood protection or mitigate to the extent possible for those affected by Elwha River flooding.
Pg. 44 = pg. 40
Alternatives
Range of Alternatives
This chapter describes the range of reasonable alternatives selected for analysis in this environmental impact statement.
The process began with public scoping of issues and alternatives in November 1994.
Alternatives identified during scoping included those initially examined in the 1994 Elwha Report.
All alternatives were considered by the EIS team; those considered reasonable were selected for further analysis.
These preliminary alternatives were subsequently reduced to the three alternatives presented in this chapter.
Since most significant issues focus on releasing sediment accumulated in the reservoirs, the teams analysis centered on different methods of sediment management.
The two action alternatives are river erosion of the sediment (Proposed Action River Erosion alternative), and dredge, slurrying, and piping of the sediments to the Strait of Juan de Fuca (Dredge and Slurry alternative).
Analysis of a No Action alternative is required, and establishes a baseline of comparison for the two action alternatives.
A discussion of the alternatives considered but rejected, including the reasons why, is presented in the final section, "Alternatives Considered But Rejected."
Existing Project Features
Existing features of both dams are described in table 4 and shown in figures 4 and 5.
No Action Alternative
The hydroelectric projects would remain in place as they are now.
No action would be taken to license the dams or install fish passage.
This alternative is required to set a baseline for comparison of impacts before and after dam removal.
Project features as described in the first section of this chapter would remain as is.
Impacts of no action, i.e., of leaving the dams in place, are summarized at the end of this chapter in chart form, and are described in more detail in the Impacts chapter.
Dam Operations
Under the No Action alternative, both dams are assumed to continue operation without significant changes.
Both projects are operated as run-of-river, typically with only minor fluctuations in reservoirs.
Natural in-stream flows are not changed by the projects and only very minor changes in flood magnitudes occur because of them.
Details on current project operations may be found in the FERC Draft Staff Report (1993, page 2-1), the Elwha Report (DOI et al. 1994), and the Final Environmental Impact Statement for Elwha River Ecosystem Restoration (DOI et al.1995).
Pg. 45 = 42
Table 4.
Summary of Features for Existing Projects
FEATURE
ELWHA PROJECT
GLINES CANYON PROJECT
Impoundment Name Lake Aldwell Lake Mills River Mile 4.9 13.4 Length of Reservoir (miles) 2.8 2.5 Crest of Dam (ft msl) 199.5 590.33 Water Surface Area (acres) 267 415 Gross Storage (acre-feet) 8,100 40,000
Concrete Dam Section Year of Construction 1910-14 1926-27 Type concrete gravity concrete arch Overall Length (ft) 450 270 Structural Height (ft) 108 210 Crest size (ft x ft) 8 x 112 4 x 150 Base width (ft) 100 46 Volume (yd3) 12,800 16,000 Sluiceways 4 (plugged) 1 (abandoned)
Water Conveyance Structures Intake Structure 1 1 Penstocks 4 1 Surge Tanks 1 1 Gated Spillways 2 (1 north, 1 south) 1
Powerplant and Transmission Facilities Turbine-generators 5 2 Overhead Transmission lines Line 1: 6 mi; line 2: 8mi Line 3: 7 mi Powerhouse 1 1 Transformer location powerhouse switch yard
Buildings and Miscellaneous Structures Maintenance shops/garages 1 2 Residences 0 2 Other outbuildings 2 2 Thrust Block 0 1 Embankment Dikes 0 2 Gate house 0 1
Pg. 46 = pg. 43
Sediment Management
Bedload sediment (sand, gravel, and cobbles) and much of the suspended load would continue to accumulate in the reservoirs and existing water quality conditions would also continue.
Operation of the dams would not be impacted by accumulating reservoir sediment for approximately another 200 years.
Flood Control
Approximately 60 homes lie within the 100-year floodplain now, and are currently susceptible to flooding even though partially protected by levees, dikes or other measures.
The Lower Elwha Federal Flood Control Levee protects most residents of the Lower Elwha Klallam Reservation and adjacent lands from up to the 200-year flood.
A private levee on the west side of the river near its mouth provides protection for some residents in this area from 25- to 50-year floods (see figure 9, Flooding Affected Environment).
Fisheries Recovery
Given the assumptions of this alternative, no fish recovery efforts would be conducted, although hatchery operations for chinook, coho and steelhead would continue.
Revegetation
Since the reservoirs would not be drained or structures removed, no revegetation would be needed.
Water Quality
Water quality in the Elwha River is excellent for domestic and industrial water use.
River water used by industrial, domestic, and hatcheries downstream has a much lower sediment content during heavy rainstorms (or other high sediment-loading events such as upstream landslides) than the natural undammed river would have.
However, elevated water temperatures aggravate fish diseases, and diminished nutrient levels reduce aquatic insect production.
Water treatment for water users varies.
Treatment for the city domestic water consists of only chlorination.
The water is naturally filtered by riverbed sands and gravels as it is pumped from the Ranney collector.
The mills use a settling channel upstream of the supply pipe, and treat inflow from the pipe with flocculation, settling and filtering.
FIGURE 4.
Elwha Dam Features (SCAN)
FIGURE 5.
Glines Canyon Dam (SCAN)
Disposition of Lands
All project lands would remain in existing ownerships.
James River Corporation owns all of the 1018-acre parcel surrounding Lake Aldwell and the Elwha Dam. James River also owns 160 acres surrounding the Glines Canyon Dam; the remainder of the land around Lake Mills is public land managed by the National Park Service.
Interpretation
There would be no changes in interpretation.
Neither the National Park Service nor James River Corporation has a specific interpretive effort at the sites.
Pg. 47 = pg. 48
Cultural Resources
The mitigation of impacts to cultural resources would not occur.
Elwha Klallam sites would remain covered by the reservoirs and inaccessible.
The historic dams would not be removed.
There would be no increased threat of loss for archeological sites or the Elwha Ranger station historic district.
Costs
Costs to operate both dams average between $6 and $10 per megawatt hour or $1 to $1.5 million per year (FERC 1993 p. 2-37).
For this cost, the mill receives approximately 38% of its annual energy requirements.
Required repairs at the two dams would cost an estimated $8.7 million in the near future (FERC 1993 p. 2-19).
There are no sediment management costs directly related to the projects although the US Army Corps of Engineers spends approximately $100,000 per year on maintenance of Ediz Hook to which the Elwha projects reduce sediment supply by 35%.
Operation of the state rearing channel costs about $235,000 per year, while that of the tribal hatchery costs about $245,000 per year.
Permitting
It is unknown how the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission licensing process would be resolved in the future.
Prior to Congress passing the Elwha Restoration Act, the commission had nearly completed a final environmental impact statement.
The proposal to license the dams in their environmental impact statement included major and very costly modifications to the projects including upstream fish passage.
The jurisdiction of the commission over the licensing of Glines Canyon Dam was the subject of complex, active litigation before the federal appellate court.
This litigation was suspended only because of passage of the Elwha Act.
The resumption of the licensing effort and litigation might be the eventual outcome under the No Action alternative.
Proposed Action River Erosion Alternative
Summary of Actions
Features of the River Erosion alternative include: * removing features of the dams necessary to restore fish passage and ensure public safety * erosion of reservoir sediments by natural river processes * restoration of historic anadromous fish runs * revegetation of the reservoir areas * monitoring of sediment transport and river channel topography, water quality, and aquatic ecology * short and long-term protection of municipal and industrial water supplies from adverse impacts of dam removal * mitigation of flood impacts to Lower Elwha Klallam Reservation residents caused by long-term river aggradation * reservoir drawdown in controlled increments with periods of constant lake elevation in between
short-term protection of native fish stock
pg. 48 = pg. 49
These elements of the proposed action are discussed in this section in more detail and also analyzed in the Impacts section.
Those mitigation measures detailed above (as well as others summarized in table 5) are considered integral to the project, and are required either by law or regulation or to achieve goals or directives in the Elwha River Ecosystem and Fisheries Restoration Act (PL 102-495).
Other mitigation measures not specifically required, but desirable to minimize impacts to important resources, are recommended (see table 5), and would be added depending on project funding.
Both Elwha and Glines Canyon dams would be removed in controlled increments; there are no plans to suddenly breach either dam.
Since there is no low-level release capability from either dam (to drain reservoirs or remove sediment), removal plans include river diversion options.
The plan to remove Glines Canyon Dam focuses on notching down the dam.
Lake Mills would be drained through these notches cut into the dam, allowing the part of the dam above the notches to be removed while dry.
The removal of Elwha Dam is more complicated than the removal of Glines Canyon Dam.
The alluvium under Elwha Dam eroded upon initial filling of Lake Aldwell which caused a large void under the gravity section.
The breach was repaired by filling the area upstream and downstream of the dam with rock debris blasted from the canyon walls.
Other fill material, including sand and gravel, a fir mattress, and a gunite cap (sprayed concrete), was subsequently placed to control seepage.
However, the void still exists under the gravity section.
This fill material is now considered part of the dam, and its removal under full lake conditions could potentially cause another failure (water flowing under the dam).
A sequence of cofferdams and diversion channels is necessary for the safe removal of Elwha Dam (see specific dam removal description below).
Table 5.
Summary of Mitigation Measures for River Erosion and Dredge and Slurry Alternatives
TOPIC
PART OF ACTION ALTERNATIVES
RECOMMENDED MITIGATION
Fluvial Processes and Sediment Transport Long-term sediment monitoring (cross-sections, air photos, stream gauging)
X
Flooding Raise and strengthen federal levee to maintain existing 200 year flood protection
X
Adjust rate of Glines Canyon Dam removal to control release rate of coarse sediment
X
Raise individual houses
X
Raise and reinforce non-federal west side levee
X
Water Quality Dredge and slurry some of silt and clay sized materials from reservoir areas*
X
Construct infiltration gallery / diversion modifications, open channel, pre-treatment for industrial users
X
Construct new Ranney collector, temporary iron treatment / filtration for municipal water use
X
Replace hatchery infiltration gallery, drill supplemental wells for Lower Elwha Klallam Reservation
X
Construct mounded septic system with lift stations for Lower Elwha Klallam Reservation
X
Connect to Ranney system or build new treatment system and wells for Dry Creek Water Association
X
Modify wellheads, flood-proof pump house, install temporary in-line water treatment system for Elwha Place Homeowners Association
X
Raise and modify wellheads, install temporary in-line filters, construct temporary storage tanks, provide bottled water, deepen existing wells, drill new wells, provide contingency fund for private well users not yet identified
X
Close WDFW fish rearing channel during dam removal
X
Provide long-term wellhead protection at WDFW fish rearing channel
X
Fisheries Gradual/intermittent release of water and sediment from reservoir
X
Dredge and slurry some of silt and clay sized materials from reservoir areas*
X
Prior to dam removal, outplant eggs or fry in upper river
X
Shut down dam removal activities to ensure minimum riverflows
X
Stop construction during high flows to protect fish (November and May to June)
X
Develop broodstocks, outplant juveniles, and evaluate adult return during and after dam removal
X
Expand Lower Elwha Klallam Tribal Fish Hatchery; dredge outlet, create new bypass
X
Vegetation Collect native plant materials from the Elwha Valley, seed both reservoirs with native grasses and forbs, plant trees of different ages and eradicate non-native vegetation.
X
Literature search, controlled planting, on-site cultivation, and biotechnical slope stabilization
X
Wildlife Trumpeter Swan mitigation
X
Species of Special Concern Noise reduction measures or changes in sequencing and timing of construction activities
X
Air Quality and Noise Periodic spraying of roads with water
X
Cultural Resources HABS/HAER documentation of dams
X
Leave parts of Glines Canyon Dam in-place (thrust block, powerhouse, spillway, penstock, and gatehouse)
X
Documentation of affected resource(s), monitor, survey, stabilize riverbank, data recovery, and avoidance
X
Public Health and Safety Cofferdams progressive reservoir lowering and other measures to prevent foundation washout under Elwha Dam
X
Stop construction during high flows to protect dam workers (November and May to June)
X
Remove transformers, asbestos, and chemicals from damsites (hazardous materials)
X
Traffic Flaggers at congested intersections if needed
X
Recreation Close watershed access
X
Provide shuttle service for park visitors to Elwha subdistrict during dam removal
X
Restrict fishing during restoration
X
Provide interpretive facilities
X
Educate users on nearby similar opportunities
X
Land Use Leave bottom lands and lands along river corridor undeveloped
X
*Dredge and Slurry alternative only
Pgs. 4951 = pgs. 50-52
The proposed action would allow the sediments presently trapped in Lake Mills and Lake Aldwell to be eroded from the reservoirs (to the extent possible) and transported downstream to the Strait of Juan de Fuca by natural processes.
River erosion is a minimum cost option for sediment management (Randle and Lyons 1995).
Except for controlling lake elevations during reservoir drawdown and the rate at which each dam is removed, the river initially would be allowed to erode reservoir sediment without mechanical intervention (such as hydraulic dredging).
However, regrading of the remaining sediment to achieve a stable slope configuration may be necessary.
The rate of sediment release from the dam would depend on the rate of dam removal, lake inflow, and sediment particle size.
Slow rates of sediment release would tend to reduce the magnitude of short-term effects but would increase the duration of those effects, high rates of sediment release would tend to reduce the duration of short-term impacts but increase their magnitude.
In the case of fish, even slow rates of fine-grained sediment release may prove to be lethal or cause fish to avoid entering the river.
Therefore, high magnitude, short-duration impacts would be preferred over low-magnitude, long-duration impacts.
Elwha and Glines Canyon dams would be removed over a two-year period to minimize the duration of high sediment concentrations in the river.
Pg. 52 = pg. 53
For both lakes, water surface elevations would be controlled during reservoir drawdown.
Each lake would be drawn down in stages in order to redistribute reservoir delta sediments within the reservoir.
After each increment of drawdown, the lake levels would generally be held constant for about two weeks.
These drawdown stages would continue until the lakes are completely drained.
Delta sediments of both lakes would erode and redeposit, forming a sequence of new deltas downstream (corresponding to the two-week drawdown increments), and temporarily covering the existing lake bed sediments.
Deposition of delta sediment farther downstream within the reservoir is expected to be uniform across the reservoir and eventually reach the dam.
The slope of the redeposited delta material would largely depend on the sediment particle size and river flow.
No significant quantities of coarse-grained sediment would be released beyond the damsites until the dams are removed down to an elevation near the top of the redeposited deltas.
Dam removal below this elevation would result in the release of high sediment concentrations.
For both lakes, fine-grained sediments would erode much faster than coarse-grained sediments.
Some boulders and cobbles present in the upstream portions of the delta may not erode at all.
For a given peak river flow during the initial erosion process, an armor layer of cobbles and boulders may develop that would prevent the erosion of finer sediments underneath.
The potential armor layer and the underlying sediments would be eroded later by higher river flows of sufficient duration.
Since the volume of cobbles and boulders is relatively small, any armor layers would be left to natural processes unless they impede fish passage.
If necessary, erosion of this armor layer would be initiated by blasting to allow fish to swim upstream.
River and estuary conditions (both physical and biological) and water intakes would be extensively monitored during the erosion of reservoir sediments.
Monitoring information could be used to adjust the rate of dam removal and, therefore, the rate of sediment release.
Sediment would be released as rapidly as possible to minimize the duration of impacts, but without exceeding the rivers sediment transport capacity or the capacity to treat municipal and industrial water.
Dam Removal
Specific details for proposed removal plans (BOR 1995c) are different for each dam because of structural differences and site characteristics, although removal of both involves very similar construction activities.
One primary difference in how the dams are removed would be the control of stream flow during the removal process.
The proposed schemes for removing the dams are based on assumptions that the same contractor would be responsible for removing both dams and that construction would begin in November.
The major steps for removal of both dams following acquisition include: site access preparation and mobilization; river diversion; structure removal; waste removal and disposal; and site restoration.
At the Elwha damsite, all structures would be removed from or buried at that site.
Portions of the Glines Canyon Dam that do not impede fish passage, and that cultural resource specialists believe are historically important, would be left in place.
Pg. 53 = pg. 54
Elwha Dam Removal
Elwha Dam removal would include pre-removal activities, dam removal, and final site restoration.
The full activity sequence is developed in a project scheduling program (BOR 1995c; and see appendix 6).
One of the primary objectives driving the sequence of activities would be to ensure that another failure below the gravity section does not occur as it did in 1912.
Pre-removal Activities.
Decommissioning is the shutdown of the power plant with continued operation of the dam in a stable run-of-river condition prior to removal.
Project decommissioning entails any work at the Elwha Dam power plant required in advance of the dam removal contract work, including de-energizing the electrical equipment, preparing selected equipment for long-term storage, removing hazardous materials, rerouting transmission lines, decommissioning the grounding grid, and removing smaller items of historical value.
The turbine runners would be removed from Units 3 and 4 to permit no-load water releases through the 15-foot-diameter penstock.
This work would likely be completed under one or more small contracts prior to dam removal.
Hazardous waste collection and disposal is discussed in Impacts to Public Health and Safety.
Improvements required to use Olympic Hot Springs Road to carry heavy equipment would also be done prior to dam removal.
Resource protection and implementing fisheries restoration would begin one to two years before dam removal.
The Lower Elwha Klallam Tribal Fish Hatchery would be expanded and changes made to ensure clean water is available during dam removal to protect broodstock and begin outplanting.
Measures to protect against impacts from water quality degradation or flooding would also be installed long before dam removal begins.
Documentation to ensure that historic qualities of the hydroelectric projects are fully inventoried is already well under way.
Dam Removal Activities.
The contractor would begin site mobilization in November of the year that construction is scheduled and continue through the winter months.
Lake Aldwell would be drawn down by March 1 to approximately elevation 182, using the south spillway and the 15-foot-diameter penstock for reservoir releases.
This would allow cofferdam construction and excavation of a diversion channel in the north spillway.
The lake would again be drawn down to elevation 182 following the spring runoff (May-June).
When Elwha Dam was first completed, the water from the reservoir washed out alluvium on which the concrete gravity structure rested and caused catastrophic flooding downstream.
Fill material composed primarily of rock blasted off the upstream canyon walls, earthfill, "mattresses" of fir trees, and a concrete (gunite) cap was placed upstream of the dam to block the rivers ability to penetrate into the alluvial foundation.
The technical challenge this fill imposes on the removal of Elwha Dam requires diverting the river from the gravity structure while the fill material is being removed.
Pg. 54 = pg.55
A surface diversion channel would be excavated through the north spillway channel to lower the reservoir level to permit removal of the concrete gravity section from the original river channel.
Glines Canyon Dam would be operated to reduce flood peaks during this period to facilitate the construction of the diversion channel.
The construction of the surface diversion channel would begin with building a temporary 10-foot-high cofferdam within the north spillway approach channel.
This would keep the channel area dry enough to remove the gunite and construct a larger, sheet-pile cofferdam approximately 20 feet high between the left abutment and a concrete block near the intake structure.
The sheet-pile cofferdam would provide construction access to a crane pad and flood protection for the work area.
The crane would remove the north spillway gate structure and penstocks.
A dragline would be used within the reservoir upstream of the sheet-pile cofferdam to excavate the diversion channel to elevation 135.
The lower portion of the diversion channel in the bedrock would be excavated by controlled blasting.
Following excavation of the diversion channel upstream and downstream of the cofferdam, the cofferdam and remaining bedrock plug would be removed.
The cofferdam would be removed first.
The bedrock plug would then be removed under flow conditions in a controlled manner.
Small sections of the bedrock plug would be removed by pre-drilling and controlled blasting to specified depths, resulting in instantaneous peak discharges that would not be expected to exceed and estimated 3000 cubic feet per second.
The entire process may take up to three weeks to allow for conditions within the reservoir to stabilize between removal stages.
Streamflow diversion would continue through the newly excavated channel for one year, with reservoir levels for average conditions varying between elevations 138 and 144.
During the low-flow period of the second year, excavation within the channel fill materials would progress below the water level within the diversion channel, resulting in the diversion of streamflow along its original course through the damsite.
The river channel would be lowered in 5-foot increments along its full length until reaching the desired surface at approximate elevation 90.
This work would be performed over a three-month period from August through October, including final channel cleanup.
All concrete structures above final grade would be removed from the Elwha Damsite.
Concrete structures below final grade of the river channel and adjoining areas would be buried during landscape recontouring.
Additional material buried on site would include an estimated 17,500 cubic yards of concrete and 10,400 cubic yards of compacted rockfill generated by the dam removal process.
This material would be used to backfill the north spillway outlet channel and penstock area to restore natural contours.
The rockfill also would be used as riprap for erosion protection.
Wood-frame structures would be retained for use during the demolition contract, then removed.
All mechanical and electrical items, timber, glass, fencing, and hazardous materials would be removed from the site for recycling, salvage, disposal or retention as historical artifacts.
Pg. 55 = 56
Removal of both dams would generate more than 200,000 cubic yards of concrete, rock, and earth fill.
Several surface mine or other open-pit owners in the Port Angeles area have indicated interest in obtaining materials from dam removal, and some of these are capable of accommodating the full volume of materials.
The Traffic section of the environmental impact statement analyzes the impacts from transport of the debris to nine possible disposal locations.
Recycling of concrete and other manufactured materials may also be possible.
Final Site Restoration.
Final site restoration includes revegetation and may include the installation of recreation, public safety, and interpretive facilities.
Details of final site restoration are explained in the appropriate appendix (see appendix 2, Elwha Fish Restoration Plan and appendix 3, Revegetation Plan).
Glines Canyon Dam Removal
Like Elwha Dam, removing Glines Canyon Dam includes pre-removal, removal, and post-removal restoration activities.
The full activity sequence is developed in a projects scheduling program (BOR 1995c; also see appendix 6) and is integrated with the removal of Elwha dam.
Since Lake Mills could be managed to provide flood protection while crews work on excavating the diversion channel for Lake Aldwell, removing Glines Canyon Dam would not begin until that diversion channel was completed to elevation 135, during July of the first construction year.
A primary constraint during the sequence of activities for removing Glines Canyon Dam would be the ability to pass flows over the dam during demolition while managing sediment releases.
Pre-removal Activities Decommissioning and Restoration Plans.
For the purposes of this EIS, decommissioning is the shutdown of the power plant with continued operation of the dam prior to removal.
Project decommissioning includes any work at the Glines Canyon Dam power plant required in advance of the dam removal contract work, including de-energizing the electrical equipment, removing hazardous materials, and removing the turbine runner from the main unit to permit no-load releases through the power penstock.
Hazardous waste collection and disposal is discussed in the Impacts to Public Health and Safety.
As with Elwha Dam, resource protection and restoration implementation would begin one to two years before dam removal.
This would include water quality and cultural resource mitigation, as well as fish restoration.
Dam Removal Activities.
Although site mobilization would begin in November, Lake Mills would be used for flood control to the maximum extent possible, until the following July, to reduce flood peaks and facilitate construction of the surface diversion channel at Elwha Dam.
Following completion of the surface diversion channel at Elwha Dam, removal of the arch dam section at Glines Canyon Dam would commence, with Lake Mills held at the lowest possible level during demolition.
Water elevations would be lowered to approximate elevation 523 (the crest of Glines Canyon Dam is at elevation 590) using the spillway and the power penstock.
Notches for streamflow diversion would be excavated from the arch dam section at 7.5-foot increments between approximately elevations 523 and 410, using diamond-wire sawcutting in reinforced areas and controlled blasting elsewhere.
An average of two blocks of 35 tons each would be removed and hauled off site each day.
The reservoir would be drawn down in 7.5-foot increments about every two weeks.
This two-week stable period would allow sediment in the delta at the upper end of the reservoir to redistribute and move closer to the dam.
While the time period between 7.5-foot drawdowns could be increased, it could not easily be decreased.
To complement fisheries restoration and protect workers, no demolition would be performed during the periods from November 15 to December 15 and from May 1 to June 30.
The lower portion of the arch dam section (including the final two lifts and the base of the dam) would be excavated in August and September of the second year during minimum stream flow.
Final channel cleanup would be completed by late October.
Each structure at Glines Canyon Dam was evaluated for possible retention, based on anticipated effects on ecosystem and fisheries restoration, historic and cultural mitigation, visitor safety, maintenance costs, demolition costs, aesthetics, and opportunities for site interpretation.
Structures recommended for removal from the site include the arch dam section, the penstock intake structure/trashrack tower, the surge tank tower, the transformer yard and shed, the left abutment earthfill embankment, and the boathouse.
Other structures would be retained, with necessary modifications.
The concrete gravity thrust block, adjoining concrete gravity section, and concrete wall on the right abutment along with the right abutment earthfill embankment are proposed to remain as a visitor view point and interpretive area (see section on Interpretation below).
Retention of the spillway would provide a visitor viewpoint on the left abutment.
The powerplant and penstock would be retained to provide a unique historical exhibit.
Pg. 56 = pg. 58
Part of dam removal would involve taking down transmission lines.
The lines extend approximately 7 miles from Glines Canyon Dam to Elwha Dam (line 3), approximately 6 miles from Elwha Dam to the Daishowa America paper mill in Port Angeles, Washington (line 1), and approximately 8 miles from Elwha Dam to the Bonneville Power Administration/city of Port Angeles substation (line 2).
However, only a portion of transmission line 3 from Glines Canyon Dam to the Elwha Ranger Station is proposed for removal.
This is to maintain power to the site.
Final Site Restoration.
Final site restoration would include revegetation and may include the installation of recreation, public safety, and interpretive facilities.
Details are presented below and in the appropriate appendixes.
Sediment Monitoring and Management
Natural river processes would be, for the most part, allowed to erode the reservoir areas.
Sediment management actions that would be taken include the seeding of native grasses and forbs and strategic placement of large woody debris after the dams were removed.
Additional details about the movement of sediment during erosion are presented in the Impacts section.
The rate and amount of reservoir sediment erosion would depend on the dam notching rate, river and tributary flows, and the frequency and intensity of rainfall.
The amount of river sediment transport would mostly depend on the river discharge and phase of the notching cycle.
Monitoring of channel aggradation conditions, water quality, and fisheries restoration needs would guide some adjustments to the dam removal rate and subsequent sediment levels from Lake Mills, and is considered integral to the project (see table 5).
An estimated 50% of the fine sediments in Lake Mills are expected to be removed; the remainder lies outside the floodplain or is buried in coarse delta sediment.
The sediment monitoring plan includes: * repeat cross-section surveying along the river below the dams and in both reservoirs, * repeat aerial photography of the river corridor and reservoir areas, and * stream measurements of river flow, suspended sediment concentration, and turbidity at Goblin Gates, at McDonald Bridge, and below Elwha Dam.
Pg. 57 = 59
The stream gauge immediately above Lake Mills at the mouth of Rica Canyon would be phased out and a new one established at Goblin Gates, the upstream entrance to Rica Canyon.
The new gauge would be operated concurrently with the existing gauge above Lake Mills for approximately one year before beginning dam removal.
The gauging station above Lake Mills would be removed upon the commencement of dam removal.
Although the gauge above Lake Mills is presently at a good location, it would be a poor quality measurement site during dam removal because of a continually eroding stream bed and difficult access.
The location at Goblin Gates would be necessary to monitor the natural sediment supply during dam removal and to help guide operation of the pre-treatment facility for the industrial water supply.
Flood Control
The Lower Elwha Federal Flood Control Levee on the east side of the river near its mouth would be raised and strengthened with riprap to maintain the existing 200-year flood protection.
Other flood control mitigation, specified in the Impacts section on flooding, is proposed, although not required by the Elwha Restoration Act.
Fisheries Recovery
The recovery of Elwha River salmon and anadromous trout involves protection of stocks during dam removal and implementation of a restoration plan after removal is complete.
The timelines for principal restoration options are presented in table 6.
The fish restoration plan (appendix 2) provides management guidelines for fully restoring all runs of Elwha River native anadromous fish.
The plan describes actions for assessing fish stocks, developing hatchery brood, reintroducing fish by outplanting, managing harvest, and evaluating restoration efforts.
Timelines and costs also are included.
The 10 anadromous fish stocks that historically used the Elwha River before dam construction are addressed, including winter and summer steelhead, searun cutthroat trout, and native char (Dolly Varden and bull trout), spring and summer/fall chinook, coho, pink, chum, and sockeye salmon.
The plan emphasizes protection of lower river stocks during and immediately following dam removal.
Because coho salmon and winter steelhead rear in freshwater for one and two years, respectively, outplanting of these species would begin from one to two years prior to dam removal.
Outplanting of chinook and coho salmon and winter steelhead in the middle and upper river would begin when fish passage and water quality were acceptable, and continue for 10 years, depending on the stock.
Pink and chum salmon would be outplanted in the middle and lower river.
Sockeye salmon (from Lake Sutherland kokanee), summer steelhead (from upper river resident rainbow trout), searun cutthroat trout, and char would be allowed to restore naturally.
TABLE 6.
Restoration Actions for Elwha River Anadromous Fish Stocks
Outplanting methods would vary by location (see appendix 2).
Above river mile 16 fish stocks would be outplanted by helicopter because of lack of road access.
Below river mile 16 outplanting would be done by conventional tank truck and from the hatchery facilities.
Hatchery support would be necessary to develop broodstock for juvenile outplanting and to maintain existing fish production levels during the rebuilding period.
The hatchery and rearing channel in the lower river and out-of-basin facilities (Sol Duc and Dungeness hatcheries) would be used to produce juvenile fish for outplanting.
Modifications to the Elwha facilities would include improvements to water supplies and upgrades in incubation, rearing, and support capabilities.
These would incorporate innovative hatchery practices that simulate natural rearing conditions and potentially improve survival in the wild.
The use of the Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife facility in the lower river would be precluded by high sediment concentrations for about two years during dam removal.
A rock check dam now used to divert surface water to industrial users (mills) would be removed to ensure full passage.
Pg. 58 = 61
For those species and stocks for which there are no viable populations in the Elwha system, other fish stocks are being assessed to identify and develop the most promising sources of broodstock for restoration.
This assessment is now being done so that sources would be available for outplanting at the first opportunity.
Adaptive management would be employed.
Adult returns would be monitored and reintroduction strategies modified as appropriate.
During the reintroduction period, in-river harvest of the recovering stocks would be curtailed only if necessary to meet adult escapement goals.
Summaries of restoration activities for each fish stock are presented below.
Spring Chinook Salmon Outplant eggs and young-of-the-year progeny of early returning summer/fall chinook salmon during early spring above Carlson Canyon.
Over time, spring return characteristics would be exhibited.
Summer/Fall Chinook Salmon Release fry, fingerling, and smolt from the Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife rearing channel, and outplant the same in the middle river.
Coho Salmon Release coho smolts from the tribal hatchery and outplant eggs and young-of-the-year or pre-smolts in the upper river.
The resident upriver rainbow population (believed to be remnant Elwha steelhead) currently produces smolts that migrate downriver.
These fish would return as adults and contribute to steelhead restoration.
Summer Steelhead Rely on natural recolonization by upriver rainbow trout stock (believed to be remnant Elwha steelhead).
Pink Salmon Assist in the recovery of the nearby Dungeness River stock, and outplant as fry and/or place eggs in remote site incubators in the middle and lower river.
Chum Salmon Develop brood from existing lower river stock.
Outplanting would be the same as for pink salmon.
Pg. 59 = 62
Sockeye Salmon Rely on natural recolonization by Lake Sutherland kokanee after dam removal.
Searun Cutthroat and Char Rely on natural recolonization by remnant lower and upriver stocks.
Revegetation
The revegetation goal for the Lake Mills and Lake Aldwell lake beds would be to restore the areas to the conditions and processes that existed prior to the construction of the dams.
Krause Bottom, upstream from Rica Canyon, provides a model of plant communities similar to those believed to have occurred within the former lake beds.
Sweets Bottom, located between the two dams, also provides a visual model of an open, flat, terraced community, although it has been modified by settlement and clearing.
The distribution and composition of native plant species within these two areas, as well as the plant communities on the slopes above the reservoirs, were used in the development of the revegetation plan.
The lake beds would be revegetated through a combination of natural recolonization and a moderately intensive program of planting native species.
The dispersal of seeds from upslope and upstream areas would result in a natural reseeding of the lake beds.
To accelerate succession, achieve a structurally complex forest ecosystem in a shorter time period, and limit invasion of non-native species, a variety of planting schemes would be used (see appendix 3).
Methods would include seeding, use of cuttings, and planting trees of different ages.
Fertilizer would be applied with selected individuals to encourage rapid stand development, and species composition would be varied to reflect plant communities on a landscape scale.
Additional treatments may include placement of large organic debris and inoculating planting stock with mycorrhizal fungi.
Plant materials would be collected only from the Elwha valley to maintain genetic integrity of the ecosystem; planting stock would be propagated prior to dam removal.
Nonnative plant species that colonize the lake beds would be controlled or eradicated.
The success of natural recolonization and planting would be evaluated annually to determine necessary modifications or remedial measures.
Such measures could include the replanting of areas where survival was poor, or manipulating stand density to better achieve goals.
The revegetation program would use a wide variety of native ferns, grasses, forbs, shrubs, and tree species including, but not limited to, vanilla leaf, sedge, sword fern, salmonberry, salal, Oregon grape, willow, bigleaf maple, red alder, western hemlock, Douglas-fir, and western red cedar.
Individual site conditions would dictate the mix of plant species used.
In wetter areas sedges, lady fern, salmonberry, black cottonwood, willow, red alder, grand fir, bigleaf maple, and western red cedar would be seeded or planted.
Upslope forest species would include sword fern, native roses, huckleberry, Oregon grape, salal, western hemlock, western red cedar, and Douglas-fir.
Additional details of the revegetation plan are in appendix 3.
Water Quality Protection
The river erosion alternative would result in periods of very high suspended sediment (silt and clay-sized particles) and bedload transport of sand and gravel.
As a part of the Elwha Restoration Act, actions are to be considered to protect water quantity and quality for municipal and industrial water users.
Pg. 60 = pg. 63
Surface water quantity below Glines Canyon would not be altered by the proposed action, with the exception of a few high flow months during year one of the project.
Flood flows would be somewhat moderated below Glines Canyon for two to three months to reduce flooding during construction of the diversion channel at Elwha Dam. Groundwater yield from some near-river wells might be altered in the short term by increases in fine sediment within the aquifer.
To provide for existing water supplies various repairs, upgrades, and short-term treatments are proposed for the existing water systems (table 7).
The facilities would be in place and operating before dam removal begins.
Disposition of Lands
Lands acquired at the Glines Canyon Damsite would become part of Olympic National Park and be managed in accord with park policies.
The majority of the area would be classified as a natural zone, managed under backcountry/wilderness guidelines.
It is expected that this area would be designated wilderness in the future in Opportunity Class IV, or Pristine.
This means that wilderness conditions, including ecosystem processes and use-related impacts, would be restored to as pristine a level as practicable.
Class III, or a Primitive designation, would be limited to a trail corridor between Boulder Creek and Cat Creek and the area at the mouth of Cat Creek, where camping would be permitted on the gravel bars.
The West Lake Mills Trail would be retained, with two to four campsites at the trails end restored to wilderness standards.
Some of the hydropower facilities at Glines Canyon would be left intact (see below) to provide interpretive opportunities or preserve important historic structures.
The Elwha Act specifies that Aldwell lands should be studied for inclusion in the national wildlife refuge system or the national park system or for transfer in trust to the tribe "for tribal housing, cultural or economic development purposes in accordance with a plan developed by the Tribe in consultation with the Secretary," or for "development and use by the State."
The US Fish and Wildlife Service has indicated that the Aldwell land area would be too small to support a wildlife refuge and is not interested in managing the lands for that purpose.
The park has stated that the lands qualify for inclusion in the park; adding them would require an act of Congress.
The Washington Department of Natural Resources has stated that it is not interested in acquiring the exposed lands if adequate provisions for public assess are made (DOI 1995, comment letter).
The department may pursue a possible cooperative management effort with the tribe.
Pg. 61 = 64
Table 7.
Water Quality Mitigation Measures
PART OF ALTERNATIVE
Industrial Supply Infiltration gallery/diversion modifications
Open channel pre-treatment City Water New Ranney well west bank
Temporary iron treatment/filtration Tribe Upgrade hatchery infiltration gallery
Supplemental wells Dry Creek WA Connect to Ranney system and new treatment (CI, filtration) system or modification to existing wells and system
RECOMMENDED MITIGATION
Tribe Mound sewage treatment Elwha Place Homeowners Association Flood proof existing wells
Temporary in-line treatment system Well owners upstream of 101 Temporary in-line filtration, bottled water Well owners upgradient of Lake Aldwell Drill new wells Well owners in river valley Raise and modify well heads All well owners (private) Contingency fund ($150,000) State rearing channel Offsite rearing
Wellhead protection
The Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe is interested in acquisition of the lands.
They have prepared a preliminary land use plan that leaves the river and floodplain protected as a conservation area with suitable uplands managed for natural resources, residential use, and/or economic development.
A primary tribal objective is to restore the rivers fishery and ecosystem any use of project lands must be compatible with this objective.
Activities on conservation lands would include fishing, hiking, hunting, and gathering of traditional cultural resources, as well as restoration efforts.
In natural resource areas, activities may include riparian and viewshed protection, primitive recreation, selective timber harvest on long rotations, vegetative management for cultural resources, and wildlife management.
Residential and economic development areas may include tribal housing and businesses.
Interpretation
Creating interpretive opportunities at both damsites is being investigated as part of possible mitigation for removal of the historic hydroelectric structures.
Interpretation would include parts of the Glines Canyon project left in place, wayside exhibits explaining key physical and biological (revegetating areas) features, and documentation of dam removal and ecosystem restoration.
Within the park, each piece of the Glines Canyon project has been evaluated for its value as an interpretive historic resource.
Several structures would be left standing, including the powerhouse, spillway, penstock, and gatehouse.
A concrete thrust block on the east side of the dam would provide an excellent view of the project area, and would be retained.
The spillway provides significant historical mitigation and interpretation opportunities.
Long-term maintenance would be minimal.
Some modifications would be necessary for visitor safety, such as improved guardrails (e.g., wire mesh to prevent children from climbing through the guardrails) and measures to prevent people from reaching the spillway chutes by climbing over the spill gates.
The penstock offers significant historical mitigation and interpretation opportunities, with minimal maintenance costs.
To provide interpretive opportunities and be included in an interpretive trail, the wooden stairway on top of the penstock would need to be replaced with a low-maintenance, metal stairway.
The penstock would probably need to be painted.
The gatehouse offers historical mitigation and interpretation opportunities.
If retained, the windows and door would be removed to prevent vandalism and the wooden stairway replaced with a low-maintenance metal stairway.
Electrical wiring and wooden power poles would be removed.
The guardrail would need modification to increase visitor safety.
A final decision whether to retain this structure would require further review.
Although the boathouse offers no retention benefits and would be removed, the two houses and maintenance shed could provide needed office and storage space during deconstruction; they might remain for a short time.
Pg. 63 = pg. 66
The powerhouse offers significant historical mitigation and interpretation opportunities.
The windows would be replaced with wire mesh and all hazardous wastes, if any, removed.
The metal shed at the site would be removed.
Cultural Resources
Lower Elwha Klallam sites would be made accessible for the first time in 80 years.
Two historic dams would be removed.
There would be an increased threat of loss for archeological sites, and historic sites such as the Elwha Ranger Station Historic District.
The cultural resource mitigating measures listed in table 8 would be implemented in compliance with Section 106 requirements of the National Historic Preservation Act.
Costs
Costs are presented in table 9.
Costs of recommended mitigation are included in these totals.
Permitting
Numerous federal, state, and local permits and review processes are required to implement the proposed action.
This document is part of one of those processes, the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969.
Required permits are presented in appendix 6.
Project permitting costs are included in the final design costs.
The Washington State Department of Ecology regulates water quality under the Clean Water Act.
The Department of Ecology also regulates water quantity with water rights for water withdrawals and permits temporary modifications of water quality criteria.
The Safe Drinking Water Act and Washington Administrative Code 173-201A also set drinking water standards.
The proposed action would be in compliance with these requirements.
The Elwha River Restoration Act authorizes the secretary of the interior to implement actions to protect municipal and industrial water supply and quality.
The proposed action would mitigate the increased levels of turbid waters with water treatment facilities and upgrades to water intakes where appropriate.
These facilities and upgrades would meet appropriate water quality standards for water supplies, providing protection from the turbid waters during and following dam removal.
Table 8.
Mitigation Measures Required under the Interagency Programmatic Agreement and Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act
IMPACT
MITIGATION
Erosion from increased river meander Monitor, stabilize bank, or data recovery Loss of tribal cultural properties Survey, monitor, response plan Erosion of terraces Monitor, stabilize bank, or data recovery Aggradation and flooding Monitor, stabilize bank, data recovery or recording of significant features Loss of historic projects (dams) HABS/HAER recording of significant features, retain some elements on site, interpretation Grading of roads Survey prior to ground disturbance, avoid or data recovery Disposal of waste rubble Survey prior to dumping, response plan Revegetation (digging may uncover resources) Survey, response plan
Pg. 64 = pg. 67
The Clean Water Act, Section 404, and the Rivers and Harbors Act, Section 10, address project dredge and fill areas, specifically for excavation in streams or wetlands, which includes structure removal and water intake upgrades.
Construction in and near the Elwha River is reviewed under the State Shoreline Management Act and requires a Hydraulic Project Approval from the Washington State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
The proposed action would be in compliance with these requirements.
Dredge and Slurry Alternative
Summary of Actions
Features of the Dredge and Slurry alternative include: * removing features of the dams necessary to restore fish passage and ensure public safety * dredging of some fine-grained reservoir sediments and transporting to the ocean by pipeline * restoration of historic anadromous fish runs * revegetation of the reservoir areas * monitoring of sediment transport and river channel topography, water quality, and aquatic ecology * short and long-term protection of municipal and industrial water supplies from adverse effects of dam removal * mitigation of flood impacts to Lower Elwha Klallam Reservation residents caused by long-term river aggradation * reservoir drawdown in controlled increments with periods of constant lake elevation in between * short-term protection of native fish stock
Table 9.
Cost Estimates River Erosion Alternative (Proposed Action)
ACTIVITY
REFERENCE YEAR (BUDGET YEAR)
(costs in thousands of dollars)
n-2
n-1
n
n+1
n+2
Balance to Complete
Total
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
Project Acquisition Direct Acquisition Costs
29,500
29,500
Other Lands 
300
250
50
Subtotal
29,800
29,750
50
Engineering Design Preconstruction Data Collection
458
458
Decommissioning of Projects
30
30
Water Quality Protection
1,531
1,523
8
Flood Protection
368
295
73
Dam Removal
800
300
500
Haz Waste Cleanup
53
45
8
Transmission Line Removal
10
10
Road Rehabilitation
48
48
Hatchery Expansions
405
320
85
Subtotal
3,703
2,651
820
93
58
81
Direct Construction Costs^a Decommission of Projects
300
300
Water Quality Protection
24,788
10,240
14,398
150
Salvage of Water Treatment Equipment
(225)
(225)
Flood Protection
3,630
1,140
1,765
725
Dam Removal
20,200
9,200
10
1
Haz Waste Cleanup
534
200
334
Transmission Line Removal
650
650
Road Rehabilitation
480
480
Hatchery Expansions
4,040
3,180
860
Subtotal
54,397
10,240
19,218
11,825
10,334
2,130
650
Construction Management
8,490
1,920
2,560
1,580
1,537
760
133
Waste Disposal Fees
1
500
500
Sediment Management/WQ Monitoring
1,894
100
610
460
320
404
Sediment Modeling
100
70
30
Cultural Resources
665
151
162
167
74
111
Fish Restoration
2,685
91
166
199
226
237
1,766
Revegetation/Wildlife
3,205
885
565
560
560
635
Marine Resources Monitoring
150
10
20
20
100
Construction Related O
1,100
500
500
100
Water Treatment Facilities
3,676
412
1,088
1,088
1,088
Dredge Hatchery
250
50
100
100
Subtotal
5,026
500
500
512
1,138
1,118
1,118
TOTAL
111,115
45,232
24,500
16,066
14,980
5,269
5,068
^a Includes those items subject to design and construction management allowances.
Pg. 65
Note: The preceding cost estimates are refined from those contained in the restoration project programmatic FEIS.
These costs will be further refined when final project designs are developed.
Generally, these further refinements can be expected to reduce costs as design constraints become more certain and contingencies are reduced accordingly.
In addition, application of value engineering procedures have the potential to further reduce costs at the final design stage.
A less probable likelihood is that costs could increase due to some as yet unforeseen cost element.
Costs at April 1995 Price Level Revised: 17-Oct-95
Dam Removal
Dam removal plans under this alternative would be essentially the same as those described under the proposed action.
Sediment Management
The Dredge and Slurry alternative would focus on reducing downstream suspended sediment concentration and turbidity by dredging lake bed sediments from Lake Aldwell and Lake Mills before they could erode downstream.
Fine sediment (silt and clay) would be transported through the slurry pipeline to the Strait of Juan De Fuca near the mouth of the Elwha River.
Natural offshore currents would then transport these sediments toward Ediz Hook.
The outfall would be located where the strong currents of the strait would rapidly disperse the sediment.
The outfall could be at a fixed location, either submerged or on the water surface, or the outfall could be movable.
The best outfall location, considering the impact of fine sediment on marine resources, would be north of Angeles Point at a water depth of 50 to 100 feet, approximately 1 mile from the shoreline.
Coarse delta sediments would be allowed to erode since they are considered to be a resource necessary to restore fish habitat downstream.
The coarse sediments would be transported primarily as bedload and would not be as likely to increase turbidity as would fine sediments.
Each reservoir would be drawn down in the same manner as described under the River Erosion Alternative.
Dredges working 24 hours a day from barges would pick up lake bed sediments immediately downstream from the progressing delta front for transport into the sediment slurry pipeline.
A majority of the lake bed sediments within the pre-dam 100-year floodplain would be removed.
The remaining portion would be allowed to stabilize within the reservoir.
Pg. 67 = pg. 69
Minimum river flows would have to be maintained during dam and reservoir sediment removal.
Slurry pipeline operation would be temporarily discontinued if the water required for the slurry mixture resulted in river flows too low for fish and downstream water users.
Two problems with dredging are possible.
First, the reservoir sediment dredging operation would need to avoid the large amount of woody debris along the reservoir bottom and shoreline.
Second, although silt- and clay-sized sediments are expected to easily flow by gravity through the sediment slurry pipeline, sand-size and larger sediment may clog it.
To alleviate the problem in Lake Mills, dredged lake bed sediment would be pumped to a settling basin or separator near the Glines Canyon Dam forebay and then into the sediment slurry pipeline.
A settling basin or separator would be used to prevent sand and coarser material from entering and plugging the slurry pipeline.
Coarse material would be discharged back into the reservoir.
Pipeline
The sediment slurry would flow by gravity where possible to minimize pumping costs.
Gravity flow would not be a problem if the pipeline route closely followed the steep channel of the Elwha River.
However, the river flows through narrow bedrock canyons below each damsite; in these canyons, pipeline construction and maintenance would be difficult.
Except for road crossings, the pipeline in the upper part of the river would be mostly above ground.
The pipeline would be steel or high density polyethylene, with diameters ranging from 26 to 42 inches.
Lateral supports could be needed approximately every 60 feet along the road.
Supports would be required in the river channel to prevent the pipeline from floating during flood stage or moving against sharp rocks.
Supports might consist of large concrete blocks or rock anchors.
The pipeline would be removed after lake bed sediments had been dredged from each reservoir.
From Lake Mills, the pipeline would be routed along the Olympic Hot Springs Road to a point near the McDonald bridge stream gauge (see figure 6).
Since the road is narrow (approximately 22 feet), some widening would be necessary to provide room for the pipeline.
The pipeline would then be routed into the river channel, under the Highway 101 bridge, and floated on Lake Aldwell to another settling basin near the Elwha Dam forebay.
The settling basin would allow dredged sediment from Lake Aldwell to enter the slurry pipeline.
From Elwha Dam to the strait, two pipeline routes are possible.
One would use gravity flow through the canyon below Elwha Dam; the other, aligned under county roads, would require pumping (the cost table for this alternative assumes the second alignment (B) would be used).
The first, Alignment A, which takes advantage of gravity flow, would either follow the river or travel along the top of the lower Elwha flood control levee to the east end of Freshwater Bay.
In salt water, the pipeline would be submerged by intermittent anchoring devices such as sand bags, concrete blocks, or cables.
The outfall end of the pipeline would be movable, allowing relocation to various sites if needed to optimize sediment distribution, adjust to changes in nearshore currents, or accomplish other objectives.
The other alignment (B) would follow all county roads from Elwha Dam.
The line would be buried for the entire route along the Lower Dam access road to Highway 112, east on Power Plant Road, north on Laird Road, east on Edgewood Drive, and north and west on Lower Elwha Valley Road to the mouth of the river.
The entire 6.5 miles of roadway would be replaced after the line was buried.
A plant with five equal sized pumping units at Elwha Dam would be required for this alignment.
Flood Control
Flood control measures would not change from the proposed action.
Fisheries Recovery
Fisheries recovery measures would not change from the proposed action.
Water Quality Protection
Even with the slurry pipeline, impacts to water quality from the fines that would wash downstream would still need mitigation.
Industrial water quality facilities would be the same as needed for river erosion; however, they would not be used as intensively because sediment concentrations would be approximately 25% of those under the river erosion alternative.
Fine sediments washed downstream would decrease by an estimated 4 million cubic yards, over one to two years, when compared with the proposed action.
About 1.2 to 2.6 million cubic yards of fine sediment in the deltas would still wash downstream as the deltas eroded.
Fines from the lakebottom floodway areas that could not be dredged would also wash downstream.
Because of these differences, operation and maintenance costs of industrial water quality protection are estimated as less for this alternative.
Pg. 68 = 71
Since impacts from iron and manganese released from pore spaces within the lakebed sediments would be reduced (see Impacts to Groundwater), some treatment systems for groundwater users would be scaled back or eliminated.
These include a recommended temporary treatment system for the Elwha Place Homeowners Association (if the River Erosion alternative is selected), and possibly a filtering system for the Port Angeles Ranney collector supply (considered integral to the proposed action).
Disposition of Lands
Disposition of lands would be the same as under the proposed action.
Interpretation
Interpretation would be the same as under the proposed action.
FIGURE 6.
Dredge 
Cultural Resources
Cultural resource mitigation is the same as in the proposed action except for the addition of the following:
Pg. 69 = pg. 73
Impact 1.
Grading of pipeline route 2.
Burying sites at outfall 3.
Dredging may uncover reservoir sites
Mitigation 1.
Survey and avoid or recover data 2.
Survey; response plan 3.
Monitor; avoid or data recovery
Costs
Costs for this alternative are summarized in table 10.
Dredging costs would be directly related to the quantity of material removed.
Lakebottom sediment density also would affect dredging rates and removal costs; dredging energy and time requirements are higher for denser materials.
Bureau of Reclamation techniques based on the number of years of impoundment and grain size distribution indicate that the dry weight of lake bed material is approximately 70 pounds per cubic foot, or 40% solids.
Since no sampling of lakebottom sediment density was undertaken for this study, cost estimates are based on a conservative assumption that there is a solid material density of 60% (100lb/ft^3)
No right-of-way acquisition for placing the pipeline is anticipated.
Temporary easements may be required for construction and placement of the pipe.
The alignment uses public rights-of-way for the entire length.
The Olympic Hot Springs Road is owned by the National Park Service.
The Washington Department of Natural Resources controls river bottom where the pipe would be placed.
Two basic alignments were considered.
Alignment A uses the Elwha River right-of-way and Olympic Hot Springs Road, while alignment B uses Olympic Hot Springs road and other roads mostly under Clallam County right-of-way.
The cost estimate for alignment A is $16.9 million.
The cost estimate for alignment B, which includes pumping costs and placing permanent pipes under Clallam County roads, is $21.1 million.
Table 10 is conservative in assuming the most costly alignment (B).
In addition to these capital costs, Daishowa America would pay about $2 million more per year for the 38% of its power now supplied by the projects (see Impacts to Socioeconomics).
Pg. 70 = pg. 74
Table 10.
Cost Estimates Dredge and Slurry Alternative
ACTIVITY
REFERENCE YEAR (BUDGET YEAR)
(costs in thousands of dollars)
n-2
n-1
n
n+1
n+2
Balance to Complete
Total
(1)
(2)
(3)
(4)
(5)
Project Acquisition Direct Acquisition Costs
29,500
29,500
Other Lands 
300
250
50
Subtotal
29,800
29,750
50
Engineering Design Preconstruction Data Collection
481
481
Decommissioning of Projects
30
30
Water Quality Protection
1,379
1,371
8
Flood Protection
368
295
73
Slurry Pipeline^b
1,120
1,120
Reservoir Dredging
100
100
Dam Removal
800
300
500
Haz Waste Cleanup
53
45
8
Transmission Line Removal
10
10
Road Rehabilitation
48
48
Hatchery Expansions
405
320
85
Subtotal
4,794
3,742
820
93
58
81
Direct Construction Costs^a Decommission of Projects
300
300
Water Quality Protection
21,943
16,815
4,978
150
Salvage of Water Treatment Equipment
(225)
(225)
Flood Protection
3,630
1,140
1,765
725
Slurry Pipeline^b
11,728
11,728
Reservoir Dredging
9,136
4,568
4,568
Dam Removal
20,200
9,200
10,000
1,000
Haz Waste Cleanup
534
200
334
Transmission Line Removal
40
40
Road Rehabilitation
480
480
Hatchery Expansions
4,040
3,180
860
Subtotal
71,806
33,363
21,371
14,902
1,520
650
Construction Management
8,990
1,920
3,000
1,700
1,477
760
133
Waste Disposal Fees
1,000
500
500
Sediment Management/WQ Monitoring
1,594
100
550
400
260
284
Sediment Modeling
100
70
30
Cultural Resources
665
151
162
167
74
111
Fish Restoration
2,685
91
166
199
226
237
1,766
Revegetation/Wildlife
3,205
885
565
560
560
635
Marine Resources Monitoring
150
10
20
20
100
Construction Related O
1,100
500
500
100
Water Treatment Facilities
890
270
450
130
40
Electricity for Lake Dredging
412
206
206
Dredge Hatchery Outlet
250
50
100
100
Subtotal
2,652
500
500
576
706
230
140
TOTAL
127,441
36,083
39,085
25,736
18,996
3,641
3,900
^a Includes those items subject to design and construction management allowances.
^b Uses overland route for pipeline to facilitate maintenance of slurry pipeline regardless of river flow; provides for discharge of sediment 1 mile offshore.
Using Alignment A would reduce total cost by $4.2 million.
Pg. 71 = pg. 75
Note: The preceding cost estimates are refined from those contained in the restoration project programmatic FEIS.
These costs will be further refined when final project designs are developed.
Generally, these further refinements can be expected to reduce costs as design constraints become more certain and contingencies are reduced accordingly.
In addition, application of value engineering procedures have the potential to further reduce costs at the final design stage.
A less probable likelihood is that costs could increase due to some as yet unforeseen cost element.
Costs at April 1995 Price Level Revised: 24-Oct-95
Permitting
Permitting is similar to the river erosion alternative with the addition of construction permits and leases or easements required for construction and operation of the slurry pipeline.
The slurry pipeline along and under roads would require traffic interruptions requiring coordination with the state and county road departments.
The river pipeline alignment involves lands controlled by the Washington Department of Natural Resources and Department of Fish and Wildlife.
Discharge of the slurry would require a National Pollution Discharge Elimination System permit (NPDES) under the Clean Water Act administered by the Washington Department of Ecology.
Temporary placement of the pipeline in the ocean may also require compliance with the River and Harbors Act.
Pg. 72 = pg. 75
The pipeline route for the road alignment option would fall almost entirely within the limits of the county right-of-way, except where the line passed under Highway 112, a Washington State highway right-of-way.
As long as installation followed standard practices and met design and construction requirements, no permits would be required from county and state agencies.
Alternatives Considered but Rejected
The narrowing down of a range of alternatives involved many steps.
To meet the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act, all alternatives must be technically and economically feasible and display common sense.
Many alternatives were eliminated because they did not meet one or all of these criteria.
The EIS team assumed that the alternatives which accomplished the same goals and had the same impacts were duplicative; the less expensive of these duplicative alternatives was usually chosen for further analysis.
Also, all alternatives must meet project objectives or goals.
These objectives were formulated by the EIS team and were based on scientific, regulatory, policy and legal requirements, and public input.
The Purpose and Need chapter lists the broad goals developed by the team.
However, many more specific objectives were developed, and these helped define the reasonableness of an alternative.
Alternatives involving removal of one dam or the other and/or fish passage measures were analyzed in the previous programmatic EIS.
The secretary of the interior has chosen to implement full dam removal to restore the Elwha River ecosystem, therefore these alternatives are not relevant to this EIS.
Table 11.
Summary of Alternatives
NO ACTION RIVER EROSION
(Proposed Action) DREDGE AND SLURRY Dams Operation of Elwha and Glines Canyon Dam would continue.
Removal of features of both Elwha and Glines Canyon dams necessary to fully restore the ecosystem and fisheries of the Elwha River would occur over a 24-month period.
Same as Proposed Action
Sediment Management and Monitoring Sediment would continue to accumulate behind the dams.
Natural river processes would be allowed to erode the reservoir areas; Dam removal would be phased to reduce sediment levels during some periods to help protect fish; River sediment processes would be monitored to help control dam demolition rates.
Downstream suspended sediment concentrations would be reduced by dredging lakebed sediments and transporting through a slurry pipeline to the Strait of Juan De Fuca.
Dam removal phasing and monitoring would be the same as for the proposed action.
Flood Control No new flood control measures The Lower Elwha Federal Flood Control Levee would be raised and strengthened to maintain existing levels of flood protection.
Other flood control mitigation is recommended although not required by law.
Same as proposed action
Fisheries Fisheries partially maintained by hatcheries Hatchery support, outplanting, harvest management, and optimal timing of dam removal would be used to help protect anadromous fish populations during the dam removal process and accelerate full restoration.
Same as proposed action.
Revegetation No revegetation Reservoirs would be revegetated to restore pre-dam conditions and processes.
Same as proposed action
Water Quality Protection Filtration and chlorination for municipal and/or industrial supplies Infiltration gallery and pre-treatment for industrial supplies; new Ranney well for municipal supply (including Dry Creek Water Association).
Other treatments (filtration, new wells, mounded septic system, raised wellheads, contingency funds etc.) recommended for EPHA, Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe and individual well users.
Water quality facilities would generally be the same as the proposed action except that Fe/Mn treatment and filtration would not be required and the industrial pre-treatment would not be used intensively.
Disposition of Lands All project lands would remain in existing ownership (James River Corporation).
Lands acquired at the Glines Canyon Damsite would become part of Olympic National Park.
Aldwell lands would be managed by the park, Washington state or held in trust for Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe.
Same as proposed action
Interpretation No changes in interpretation.
Interpretation would include leaving parts of the Glines Canyon project in place, wayside exhibits explaining key historic events in the construction of the dams, physical and biological features, and documentation of dam removal and ecosystem restoration.
Same as proposed action
Cultural Resources No cultural resource mitigation occurs.
Cultural resource mitigating measures (avoidance, survey, documentation, monitoring) would occur in compliance with the Section 106 requirements of the National Historic Preservation Act.
Same as proposed action except with additional measures to mitigate impacts of dredging and construction of the slurry pipeline.
Costs $1.0 to 1.5 million per year to operate; $8.7 million for future repairs; $100,000 per year indirect costs to maintain Ediz Hook; $480,000 total hatchery costs per year $111.1 million total cost over an 18-year period plus increased power costs for Daishowa. $127.4 million total cost over an 18-year period plus increased power cost for Daishowa.
Permitting It is unknown how FERC licensing would be resolved.
Litigation would probably resume.
Numerous federal, state, and local permits and review processes would be required.
Several permits required for compliance with Clean Water Act sections.
Same as proposed action except with additional reviews for construction and operation of the slurry pipeline.
Pg. 73
Dam Removal
Elwha Dam
The EIS team examined an option at Elwha Dam which would have left in place most of the dam and all of the fill placed behind the dam to stabilize it after its foundation failed in 1912.
A channel excavated through the bedrock of the left abutment would have created a new river alignment through which fish could swim.
The Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe noted this would prevent use of some of the land and would continue to prevent access to an important cultural resource, the creation site of the Elwha people.
The left abutment bedrock outcrop itself is also a significant cultural resource to the tribe.
This minimum removal alternative would not return the channel to its pre-dam configuration, one of the objectives developed by the EIS team.
For these reasons, this alternative was eliminated.
Pg. 75 = pg.78
Both the FERC Draft Staff Report (1993) and the 1994 Elwha Report examined building a tunnel to drain Lake Aldwell; one through the left abutment (FERC) and one through the right (Elwha Report).
A lake tap and gate shaft would be installed to control flows, and the reservoir would have been drawn down in stages.
The diversion tunnel alternative was believed to afford a large degree of downstream safety during the dam removal and sediment control (although it could plug with logs and sediment).
It was considered because reservoir levels could be controlled and safely pass high flows while minimizing chances for uncontrolled release of water and sediment through the potentially unstable channel fill materials.
The estimated cost for the diversion tunnel and structure removal was $14.53 million (1992 dollars), compared to $8.59 million for a diversion channel.
Recent Bureau of Reclamation experience with a similar tunnel at the Theodore Roosevelt Dam in Arizona led to the conclusion that $14.53 million was an underestimate of costs.
In addition to cost, the bedrock is recognized by the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe as a cultural resource.
The bureau of Reclamation identified significant safety risks associated with construction of the tunnel.
Since other streamflow diversion methods would be technically feasible at a lower cost, the diversion tunnel alternative was eliminated.
A major concern for the removal of Elwha Dam is the potential instability of the fill materials placed to plug the initial breach under the dam and cut off seepage during its early history (1912-1919).
A failure of the alluvium that supports the dam foundation similar to that in 1912 could recur during removal.
Although the concrete gravity section would probably remain (as it did in 1912), the rapid, uncontrolled release from the reservoir might be catastrophic.
Pg. 76 = pg. 79
An option was considered to reduce seepage flow by driving large diameter (5-to 6-foot) piles through the channel fill at the upstream face of the dam and into the bedrock.
Advancing the piles through the rockfill, boulder, and logs in the channel fill could have been very difficult, and its effectiveness in controlling seepage beneath the dam would probably be minimal because the piles would not form a perfect seal.
If an average -inch gap remains between the individual piles and the rock contact, the cutoff efficiency would be only 28%.
That is, 72% of the seepage flow occurring without the cutoff piles would still pass through the gaps in the pile wall.
For these reasons, this option was rejected as ineffective.
The Bureau of Reclamation also examined backfilling the void beneath the dam with grout or concrete to stabilize its foundation.
However, holes drilled through the dam in 1967 indicated the rockfill underlying the fir mattress (used as part of the fill material) is essentially free-draining.
Backfilling or grouting the void space beneath the dam would reduce drainage, change flow paths, and possibly initiate failure of the underlying sand and gravel, the very situation the team is trying to avoid, and so it was rejected.
A third option that received serious consideration was the construction of a berm against the toe of the dam to stabilize the foundation of the structure.
In this way, the upstream fill could be breached, and the dam notched down in a controlled fashion.
When the dam was reconstructed in 1913, the downstream area was filled in first, and a stable, though pervious, condition was attained with the reservoir at elevation 118.
It appears the upper 20 feet of the downstream fill has been eroded since the reconstruction due to spillway discharges.
If this free-draining fill were to be replaced and increased sufficiently to provide an appropriate safety factor (for the higher reservoir level after the fir mattresses were breached), conditions would be stable.
The upstream fill could be breached and monitored.
However, several problems were identified, including (1) the berm would have to resist streamflows and possibly flood flows during notching of the dam, (2) the berm may have to extend above the existing sluiceways, so that they could not be used as low-level outlets, (3) a source of rockfill would be needed for berm construction, and (4) removal of the berm materials would be required following demolition of the dam.
These unsolved problems eliminated this option.
A fourth alternative would have removed the concrete plugs in all four of the existing Elwha Dam sluiceways to create low-level outlets.
Although this would partially drain the reservoir, the excavation of unstable fill might have required a steep cut slope to safely pass flows.
A downstream stability berm would be required to prevent blowout of the foundation materials under the higher reservoir heads.
This option presented several technical concerns with no apparent cost savings, and so was rejected.
Glines Canyon Dam
Previous studies assumed concrete demolition using conventional drill and blast techniques.
A variety of alternative demolition methods was evaluated for the current studies, including diamond-wire sawcutting, stitch drilling, chemical splitting, hoe-ramming, high-pressure waterblasting, flame-cutting, and combinations of these methods.
The diamond-wire sawcutting and boom-mounted hydraulic impact hammer (or hoe-ramming) methods of concrete demolition warranted further study.
Diamond-wire sawcutting was used extensively to breach Waddell Dam, a multiple-arch concrete dam in Arizona.
Bluebird Dam, a 58-foot-high concrete arch dam in Rocky Mountain National Park, was completely demolished using a boom-mounted hydraulic impact hammer.
Pg. 77 = pg. 80 
Hoe-ramming would produce concrete rubble, which would be easier to remove if, as at Bluebird Dam, material was air-lifted.
However, large cranes or cableways would be less expensive and more practical at Glines Canyon Dam.
Larger cuts of smooth-faced blocks of concrete could be loaded on trucks by the cranes.
This combination was found to be more cost-effective; hoe-ramming seem to offer no clear advantage over diamond-wire saw-cutting for the majority of the excavation at Glines Canyon Dam. Hoe-ramming may be used for final cleanup on the rock abutments.
Stream Diversion
The Elwha Report included an alternative of a diversion tunnel through the left abutment of Glines Canyon Dam, with an intake near the existing power tunnel intake and an outlet approximately 100 feet downstream of the power plant.
Following construction of the diversion tunnel, reservoir levels would be lowered and streamflow would completely bypass the demolition area.
The lake tap inlet would be lowered in 10-foot stages by controlled blasting as the reservoir was drawn down.
A cofferdam constructed just upstream of the tunnel outlet would permit construction of a haul road to the base of the dam for removal of concrete rubble.
The diversion tunnel and gate shaft would be plugged following removal of the dam.
The estimated cost for the diversion tunnel and structure removal was $12.37 million (1992 dollars)
The EIS team believed significant risk and expense would be associated with the construction of a temporary diversion tunnel at Glines Canyon Dam (as with Elwha Dam).
Based on experience at Theodore Roosevelt Dam, costs of constructing a tunnel at Glines Canyon Dam were probably underestimated in the Elwha Report.
Since other streamflow diversion methods would be technically feasible at lower costs, the diversion tunnel alternative was eliminated from further consideration.
The Elwha Report also included an alternative of enlargement of the existing 5-foot diameter sluiceway outlet in the arch dam section.
Construction of the new outlet would require the underwater removal of the trash rack and installation of a large steel bulkhead on the upstream face of the dam.
Reservoir releases would continue to be made through the power penstock until completion of the new outlet.
Reservoir releases through the new outlet would be controlled to elevation 460 by a 117-inch-diameter fixed-cone valve.
Below elevation 460, stream flow would pass through gated notches in the remaining portion of the dam in a progressive stepped approach.
The estimated cost for the low-level outlet and structure removal was $8.44 million (1992 dollars).
The Draft Staff Report briefly described a similar diversion alternative, requiring a new 7.5 foot-diameter outlet through the arch section with a 6-foot-diameter regulating valve for low-level releases, but structural analyses were not conducted to confirm its feasibility.
Although the EIS team believes this alternative would be technically feasible, the element of risk associated with underwater construction and the probable interference of debris and sediments at the upstream face of the dam on the bulkhead installation and operation of the outlet would be of concern.
There seemed to be no clear advantage in construction costs for this alternative, and design costs would be higher for the necessary structural analyses.
The FERC Draft Staff Report and the Elwha Report briefly discussed a channel bypass alternative which would use the existing power intake and penstock for streamflow diversion.
A small diversion embankment would divert flows at the upper end of the reservoir to a trapezoidal channel along the western edge of the reservoir for 8000 to 9000 feet.
Numerous potential problems and very high construction costs were identified for this alternative, and no further studies were made.
Pg. 78 = 82
Sediment Management
The EIS team considered many different methods to manage sediment.
Approximately 9 million cubic yards of the 18 million cubic yards of sediment stored behind the dams is "fine" composed of smaller-sized particles, mostly silt and some clay-sized sediment.
The remainder is coarse, and consists of sand, gravel, cobbles and boulders.
In the Elwha Report, nine different sediment management scenarios were examined for technical and economic feasibility.
All use one or a combination of river erosion, mechanical removal, and/or stabilization.
A short summary of each of these nine follows:
Scenarios 1 and 2 would hydraulically dredge or mechanically excavate both fine and coarse sediments.
In scenario 1, the material would be disposed of on land; in scenario 2, in salt water.
Both scenarios envisioned the use of trucks to haul the material to land disposal sites or to barge-loading facilities for ocean disposal.
Preliminary cost estimates indicated scenario 1 at an estimated $200 million, scenario 2, approximately $300 million.
Later work done as part of this planning process showed that coarse sediment would not be as problematic for fish as originally thought, and is in fact a resource, so it would not need to be dredged and removed.
Also, slower removal of the dams would moderate the release of coarse sediment to minimize impacts from short-term flooding.
Further work also showed that a pipeline to slurry sediment would be significantly less expensive than truck dredged material, and would accomplish the same goal.
Therefore, both alternatives 1 and 2 were eliminated from further study.
Removing the coarse or delta material is also part of alternatives 8 and 9 in the Elwha Report.
Since coarse sediment would not cause significant impacts for aquatic life, these alternatives were also eliminated.
Pg. 79 = pg. 82
Scenarios 3 and 4 used river erosion, wholly or in part, to remove sediments from behind the dams.
Scenario 3 would let the river erode all sediment, fine and coarse, to the ocean.
Scenario 4 would have used the river to erode fine sediment from Lake Mills downstream to Lake Aldwell, where some would settle.
Coarse sediment would have been transported to Lake Aldwell in a pipeline.
Although both are considered feasible, scenario 4 would have involved dredging Lake Aldwell to make room for Lake Mills sediments.
Lake Aldwell would have been left in place indefinitely, causing passage mortality for fish and only partially restoring the ecosystem.
Since the decision to fully restore the fisheries and ecosystem had already been made, this alternative was dropped from further study.
Scenario 3, river erosion of all sediments remains a viable option and is the proposed action in this environmental impact statement, although its analysis is much more rigorous.
Scenarios 5, 6, 7 all depend entirely or partly on the stabilization of fine and/or coarse sediments.
Stabilization would leave most of the sediment in the reservoir area, and would attempt to keep it in place through revegetation or mechanical means.
Subsequent work has shown it would be very difficult to stabilize fine material in the reservoir area, and storing it would cause a restricting of the natural floodplain width.
Reservoir drawdown tests have indicated that fines erode quickly, and stabilizing them inside the natural 100-year floodplain would be impossible during flood flows over the long term.
Outside the floodplain, rain would wash the fines into the river.
Attempting to stabilize reservoir sediments in place would result in the periodic release of large suspended sediment loads into the river over many years a condition that could reduce the chances of timely restoration of many fish stocks.
Nor would stabilization by mechanical means permit restoration of the pre-dam landscapes.
Deliberate stabilization of fines, and scenarios 5, 6 and 7 in the Elwha Report, have been rejected for these reasons.
Scenario 5 in the Elwha Report would have dredged material and placed it in the path of the river to erode naturally.
A computer model using data from an 18-foot drawdown of Lake mills shows it is more efficient to maximize the potential of the river to erode reservoir and delta sediments by holding water levels in the reservoir steady for a short period of time after each step in dam removal.
This would redistribute sediments downstream, closer to the dam face, and increase the amount of sediment the river removes.
The EIS team also examined alternatives not in the Elwha Report.
One would have mechanically removed fine sediment from Lake Aldwell, and used river erosion to remove all sediment from Lake Mills and coarse sediment from Lake Aldwell.
This alternative was developed to decrease the duration of high sediment impacts while extending the duration of dam removal activities.
However, fish biologists agreed the greatest impact would come from fines in Lake Mills and that any initiation of work on Lake Aldwell would make the river turbid.
Therefore, making a special effort to dredge fines from Lake Aldwell first would not be helpful for fish.
Removal of Glines Canyon Dam first with Elwha Dam in place was considered but rejected because Lake Aldwell would not trap all sediments eroded downstream from Lake Mills; water quality mitigation would still be necessary.
Even with Elwha Dam in place, most of the silt and clay eroded from Lake Mills would pass through Lake Aldwell since the sediment trap efficiency of Lake Aldwell is less than that of Lake Mills (Hosey and Associates 1988).
Another alternative based on a similar idea would have dredged fines from Lake Mills and dumped them into the river below Glines Canyon Dam.
This would have allowed a greater measure of control in determining when and to what degree fines would enter the water column.
However, the degree of suspended sediment would still have been extremely high lethal to fish and conferring no advantage in the design of water quality mitigation measures.
Both these alternatives were eliminated from further consideration.
Pg. 80 - 102 = pg. 84 - 100
Table 12.
Impact Summary Chart
IMPACT TOPIC NO ACTION RIVER EROSION
(Proposed Action) DREDGE AND SLURRY SEDIMENT MANAGEMENT Reservoir areas Reservoirs continue to trap sediments, (now 13.8 million cubic yards in Lake Mills and 3.9 million cubic yards in Lake Aldwell).
1.2-2.6 million cubic yards of coarse, and 4.8-5.6 million cubic yards of fine sediment would erode from reservoirs.
1.2-2.6 million cubic yards of coarse, and 1.2-1.4 million cubic yards of fine sediment would erode from reservoirs; remainder slurried to strait.
Downstream channel Reduced amounts of coarse-grained sediments (sand-size and larger) downstream of reservoirs, less meandering of river, armoring of river channel.
Fine-grained sediment and sand would move rapidly downstream, approaching background levels in 2 to 6 years; coarse sediments deposit and agg
